 “Now we have four-month-old mice that no longer have diabetes,” he added.
 According to a warning by Dr. Ehud Ur, a professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and chair of the Canadian Diabetes Association's Clinical and Scientific Committee, the research is still in its early stages.
 Like some other experts, he doubts that diabetes is curable, noting that these findings do not apply to people who already have type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, Sara Danius, permanent secretary of the Swedish Academy’s Nobel Committee, publicly announced on Swedish radio station Sveriges that the committee, which failed to contact Bob Dylan directly to inform him that he had won the 2016 Nobel Prize in Literature, was giving up on trying to reach him.
 Danius said: "Now we are doing nothing. I have been calling and sending emails to his closest collaborator and I have received very friendly replies. For the moment, that is enough."
 Earlier, Ring CEO Jamie Siminoff noted that this company started with the fact that he did not hear the doorbell in his garage workshop.
 He said he created a doorbell that works off of WiFi.
 Siminoff said sales grew after his appearance on the 2013 episode of the show “Shark Tank,” where the show’s judges declined to fund his startup.
 In late 2017, Siminoff appeared on the shopping channel QVC.
 In addition, Ring settled a lawsuit with a competitor, the security firm ADT Corporation.
 Although an experimental vaccine has been found to reduce mortality from Ebola, no drug has yet been shown to have a clear effect in treating existing infection.
 The cocktail of ZMapp antibodies initially showed promising results in this area, but official studies have shown that it has less benefit in preventing death than previously expected.
 In the PALM trial, ZMapp served as a control, meaning scientists used it as a baseline and compared it to three other treatments.
 The USA Gymnastics Federation supports the letter from the United States Olympic Committee and agrees with the absolute necessity of creating a safe environment for all of our athletes.
 We agree with the USOC statement that the interests of our athletes, clubs, and their sports are better served by reforming our organization rather than having it decertified.
 USA Gymnastics supports an independent investigation that could shed light on how the abuse described so bravely by survivors of Larry Nassar could have gone on for so long unnoticed, and supports all necessary and appropriate changes.
 The USA Gymnastics and the United States Olympic Committee have the same goal of making gymnastics and other sports as safe as possible for athletes so they can pursue their goals in a safe, positive environment and be empowered with all rights.
 In the 1960s, Brzezinski served as an advisor to John F. Kennedy, then in the administration of Lyndon B. Johnson.
 During the 1976 election, he advised Carter on foreign policy issues, and then from 1977 to 1981 he served as national security adviser, succeeding Henry Kissinger.
 As a national security adviser, he helped Carter in world diplomacy, for example, in the conclusion of the Camp David Accords in 1978, the normalization of U.S.-China relations in the late 1970s, the development of policy in relation to the Iranian revolution, which led to the hostage crisis in 1979, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 This film starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone received nominations in all the major categories.
 Gosling and Stone were nominated for best actor and actress respectively.
 Other nominations include: "Best Picture," "Director," "Cinematography," "Costume Design," "Film Editing," "Original Music," "Art Direction," "Sound Editing," "Sound" and "Original Screenplay."
 Two songs from the film — Audition (The Fools Who Dream) and City of Stars — were nominated for best original song, and Lionsgate was nominated in 26 categories, more than any other studio.
 Late Sunday night, US President Donald Trump, through his press secretary, announced that US troops would leave Syria.
 The statement came after Trump held a telephone conversation with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdogan.
 In addition, Turkey will play a leading role in the issue of protecting captured ISIS fighters, whom, according to the statement, European states have refused to return home.
 This not only confirms that at least some dinosaurs had feathers, which is already a widely accepted theory, but also provides details that can’t usually be gleaned from fossil remains, such as color and three-dimensional structure.
 Scientists say that the plumage of this animal was above chestnut-brown color, and from below - either pale or had carotenoid pigmentation.
 The find also allows us to see the evolution of feathers in birds.
 Since the dinosaur feathers lack a well-developed rachis, but still have other distinctive features - beards and mustaches - the researchers concluded that the rachis most likely appeared later through the evolutionary development of other distinctive features.
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used for flight, but rather for temperature regulation and display. Researchers have suggested that although this is the tail of a young dinosaur, the sample represents adult plumage, not a chick's down.
 Researchers have suggested that, despite the fact that this is the tail of a young dinosaur, this specimen has the plumage of an adult individual, and not the down of a chick.
 Yesterday morning, a car bomb exploded near the main police headquarters in Gaziantep (Turkey), killing 2 police officers and wounding more than 20 people.
 The governor's office said 19 of the wounded were police officers.
 Police said the attack was suspected to have been carried out by a suspected Daesh (ISIS) militant.
 They found that the Sun works on the same basic principles as other stars: it was established that the activity of all stars in the system is determined by their brightness, rotation and nothing else.
 The combination of luminosity and rotation is used to determine the Rossby number of a star, which is related to the mass loss rate of the star.
 The lower the Rossby number, the less active the star is with respect to magnetic field reversals.
 Iwasaki often found himself in unpleasant situations while traveling.
 He was robbed by pirates, attacked by a rabid dog in Tibet, escaped a wedding in Nepal and was arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard operates on both frequencies – 2.4 GHz and 5.0 GHz.
 This will ensure backward compatibility with 802.11a, 802.11b and 802.11g, provided that the base station has a dual receiver.
 Speeds 802.11n are significantly faster than its predecessors with a maximum theoretical throughput of 600 Mbit / s.
 Duval, who is married and has two teenage children, did not make a great impression on Miller, who was told the story.
 When Miller was asked for a comment, he said, "Mike talks a lot during hearings... I was preparing, so I didn't really listen to what he was saying."
 "We will make efforts to significantly reduce carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP by 2020 compared with the level of 2005," Hu said.
 He did not give a figure for budget cuts, saying they would be made based on the productivity of China's economy.
 Hu urged developing countries to "avoid the old pattern of first polluting and then cleaning up."
 He added that "they should not, however, be asked to commit themselves to undertakings that go beyond their stage of development, responsibility and capacity."
 At 12:00 GMT today, the Iraq Study Group presented its report.
 He warns: "No one can guarantee that any plan of action in Iraq in the current situation can stop the religious war, the growing violence or the looming chaos."
 The report opens with a call for open debate and consensus-building in the United States on Middle East policy.
 The report is a scathing critique of almost every aspect of the current policy of the executive branch in Iraq and an urgent call for an immediate change of course.
 The first of the 78 recommendations is that a new diplomatic initiative should be implemented by the end of this year to strengthen Iraq's borders to prevent hostile interference, and to resume diplomatic relations with neighbors.
 Current Senator and Argentina's first lady Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner announced her candidacy for president last night in La Plata, a city 50 kilometers (31 miles) from Buenos Aires.
 Ms Kirchner announced her intention to run for president at the Argentine theatre, the same place where she launched her Senate campaign in 2005 as a member of the Buenos Aires delegation.
 The debate was sparked by disagreements over the cost of providing material support and rebuilding buildings after Hurricane Katrina, which some fiscal conservatives jokingly referred to as "Bush's New Orleans bailout."
 Liberal criticism of the reconstruction effort focused on the fact that contracts for reconstruction work were allegedly given to companies with ties to the government.
 More than four million people traveled to Rome to attend the funeral.
 The number of people present was so great that not everyone could get into St. Peter's Square, where the funeral was held.
 Large television screens were set up in various parts of Rome, through which people could watch the ceremony.
 Similar events, which were attended by large numbers of people, were organized in many other Italian cities and in the rest of the world, in particular in Poland.
 Historians criticize the FBI's past policy of devoting most of its resources to cases that are easily solved, especially car thefts, in order to boost the agency's success rate.
 Congress began funding the anti-pornography initiative in 2005 fiscal year and determined that the FBI should dedicate 10 agents to fighting adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa scored a record number of points in the innings: 70 runs for only 41 pitch, hit 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 Middle order batsmen Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid performed well and earned a combined score of 100 runs.
 However, after losing the captain's caliper, India made only 36 runs, losing 7 calipers to complete the innings.
 U.S. President George W. Bush arrived in Singapore on the morning of November 16, beginning his week-long tour of Asia.
 He was greeted by Singapore's Deputy Prime Minister Wong Kan Seng. He then discussed trade and terrorism issues with Singapore's Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong.
 A week after the midterm election defeats, Bush announced to the public the expansion of trade with Asia.
 Prime Minister Stephen Harper agreed to refer the Clean Air Act to a party-wide committee before second reading. This followed a 25-minute meeting with NDP leader Jack Layton at the PMO on Tuesday.
 At a meeting with Prime Minister Layton, he asked for changes and "rewrite completely" the Conservative Party's environmental bill.
 Since the federal government intervened and took over the funding of the Mersey Hospital in Devonport (Tasmania), the state government and some members of the federal parliament have criticised the move as a ploy in the run-up to the federal election due in November.
 But Prime Minister John Howard said it was done only to protect the hospital from a reduction in funding by the Tasmanian government by providing an additional A$45 million.
 According to the latest bulletin, sea level observations indicated an approaching tsunami, and seismic activity was recorded near Pago Pago and Niue.
 Tonga has not reported any major damage or casualties, but there was a temporary power outage, which, according to reports, prevented the Tongan authorities from receiving a tsunami warning sent by the Pacific Tsunami Warning Center (PTWC).
 Fourteen schools in Hawaii, located on or near the coast, were closed Wednesday despite the cancellation of warnings.
 US President George W. Bush welcomed the statement.
 Bush spokesman Gordon Johndro called the North Korean pledge "a big step toward the goal of verifiable nuclear disarmament of the Korean peninsula."
 Today, a sub-tropical cyclone Jerry has formed in the Atlantic Ocean, this is the tenth cyclone to be named in this season of hurricanes in the Atlantic.
 According to the National Hurricane Center, Jerry currently poses no threat on land.
 According to the chief of the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers, 6 inches of rainfall could have breached the damaged dams.
 The Ninth Ward, flooded 20 feet during Hurricane Katrina, is now underwater because the nearby levee was not high enough to hold back the water.
 The water is spilling over the dam in a 100-foot-wide section.
 Commons administrator Adam Hyde expressed his frustration over deletions in his conversation last month with Wikinews.
 “He [Wales] essentially lied to us from the beginning. First, by acting as if it was necessary for legal reasons. Second, by pretending to listen to us until he was removed from the images.”
 Public outrage has led to the development of a content policy for the site, which hosts millions of openly licensed media.
 The work was mainly theoretical, but the program was written to simulate observations of the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 The effect the team was looking for could be caused by tidal forces between the dark matter of the galaxy and the dark matter of the Milky Way.
 Just as the Moon attracts the Earth, causing tides, so the Milky Way affects the galaxy in Sagittarius.
 Scientists were able to conclude that dark matter affects other dark matter in the same way as ordinary matter.
 According to this theory, a significant portion of the dark matter around the Galaxy is in the form of a halo and consists of a large number of small particles.
 Television reports show white smoke coming from the plant.
 Local authorities warn residents living near the station to stay indoors, turn off air conditioners and not drink tap water.
 According to Japan's Nuclear Regulation Authority, the plant was found to have radioactive cesium and iodine.
 Authorities suspect that this indicates a possible hole and leak in the uranium fuel containers on the site.
 In the course of research in the South African region of KwaZulu-Natal, Dr. Tony Moll managed to detect tuberculosis with exceptionally high resistance to drugs (XDR-TB).
 In an interview, he said that the new strain "raises very big concerns, because it leads to very high mortality".
 Some patients may have been infected in the hospital, Dr. Moll thinks, and at least two were health care workers at the hospital.
 In one year, an infected person can infect 10 to 15 people in close contact.
 However, the percentage of people with multidrug-resistant tuberculosis in the entire group of tuberculosis patients still seems low; 6000 out of a total of 330,000 infected at a given moment in South Africa.
 The satellites, each weighing more than 1,000 pounds and traveling at about 17,500 miles per hour, collided at an altitude of 491 miles above the Earth's surface.
 Scientists say the explosion caused by the collision was very powerful.
 They are still trying to determine how big the collision was and how much the Earth will be affected.
 The U.S. Strategic Command is searching for debris.
 The results of the analysis of the graphs will be posted on a public website.
 A charge of murder with aggravating circumstances will be filed against a doctor who worked at the Children's Hospital of Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, after her mother was found dead in the trunk of her car on Wednesday, Ohio authorities said.
 Dr. Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found in Blue Ash, Ohio, a suburb about 15 miles north of Cincinnati, lying on the ground in a T-shirt and underwear and apparently in a state of severe drug intoxication.
 She sent officers to her black Intrigue Oldsmobile, which was 500 feet away.
 There they found the body of 53-year-old Sarodji Balasubramanian, covered in blood-soaked sheets.
 Police said the body had probably been there for about a day.
 The first cases of the disease this season were reported in July.
 The carriers are pigs, from which the disease is then transmitted to humans by mosquitoes.
 This outbreak prompted the Indian government to take measures such as setting up pig traps in severely affected areas, distributing thousands of mosquito nets and spraying pesticides.
 The government also promised several million doses of the meningitis vaccine, which will help to prepare health facilities for next year.
 Plans to deliver vaccines to the historically hardest-hit areas this year have been delayed due to a lack of funding and low priority compared to other diseases.
 In 1956, Slaney moved to Sweden, where three years later he began working for the Swedish Postal Company, and became their chief engraver.
 He created more than 1,000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries.
 His work is so well known for its quality and detail that he is one of the few "household names" among philatelists, with some specializing in collecting only his works.
 His magnificent 2000-year-old thousand-krona note reproduces David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl's "Great Deeds of the Swedish Kings", it is entered in the Guinness Book of World Records.
 In addition, he was engaged in the engraving of banknotes for many countries. Recent examples of his work are the portraits of the Prime Minister on the front of the new Canadian banknotes of 5 and 100 dollars.
 After the accident, Gibson was taken to the hospital, but soon died.
 The 64-year-old truck driver was not injured in the accident.
 The car itself was removed from the scene of the accident the same day at about 12:00 GMT.
 A man working in a garage near the scene of the accident said: "There were children there waiting to cross the road. They were all crying and screaming.
 Everyone ran away from the place where the accident occurred.
 Other issues on the agenda in Bali include preserving the world's remaining forests and exchanging technologies to help developing countries grow with fewer polluting effects.
 The UN also hopes to complete the creation of a fund to help countries affected by global warming to deal with its effects.
 This money could go towards building flood-resistant homes, using water resources sustainably and diversifying crops.
 Fluk wrote that attempts to silence women about women's health have been unsuccessful.
 She came to this conclusion because of the numerous positive comments and support she received from both women and men who argued that contraceptives should be considered a medical necessity.
 When the fight ended, after the wounded were taken to the hospital, about 40 prisoners remained in the yard and refused to return to their cells.
 Negotiators tried to correct the situation, but the demands of the prisoners are not clear.
 Between 10:00 and 11:00 p.m. mountain time, the prisoners set fire to the courtyard.
 Soon, guards in protective gear walked through the courtyard and herded the prisoners into a corner, using tear gas.
 As a result, a fire brigade extinguished the fire at 23:35.
 After the construction of the dam in 1963, seasonal floods, which spread sediments along the river, ceased.
 This sediment was required to form beaches and sandbars, which were the habitat of wild animals.
 This has led to the extinction of two fish species and the endangerment of two others, including the paddlefish.
 Although the water level will rise only a few feet after the flood, authorities hope that this will be enough to restore the washed-out sandbars downstream.
 There were no warnings of a tsunami and, according to the Jakarta Geophysical Agency, there will not be, as the magnitude of the earthquake did not reach 6.5.
 Despite the lack of a tsunami threat, residents began to panic and leave the premises of their companies and their homes.
 Although Winifred was ready to cry during the farewell, she made it clear to her fans that she would return.
 "This is not a farewell. This is a closing of one chapter and the opening of a new one."
 According to the final results of the presidential and parliamentary elections in Namibia, the incumbent President Hifikepunye Pohamba was re-elected with a large margin.
 The ruling South West Africa People's Organization (SWAPO) also retained its majority in the parliamentary election.
 Coalition and Afghan forces moved into the area to secure the facility, and another coalition aircraft was sent to provide support.
 The fall occurred in the highlands, and is believed to have been the result of enemy fire.
 Attempts to search for the crash site are hampered by bad weather and difficult terrain.
 The medical charity Mango, Doctors Without Borders and the World Health Organization said it was the worst outbreak in the country's history.
 Doctors Without Borders spokesman Richard Vigne said: "Angola is heading for its worst outbreak ever and the situation in Angola remains very bad."
 The matches started at 10:00 in perfect weather, and if not for the drizzling morning rain, which quickly passed, it was an ideal day for rugby 7.
 Favourites of the tournament from South Africa started with the right note when they won a beautiful victory with a score of 26-00 over Zambia, which is in 5th position.
 Looking distinctly worse in their game against their southern sisters, South Africa gradually improved their performance as the tournament progressed.
 They were distinguished by disciplined defense, mastery of the ball and excellent teamwork, and it was clear that it was not easy to beat this team.
 Official representatives of the authorities of Amsterdam and the Anne Frank Museum say that the tree is infected with a fungus and poses a public danger, as there is an immediate threat of its falling.
 It was scheduled to be cut down on Tuesday, but an emergency court order has saved it.
 The diameter of all the entrances to the cave, which were named "Seven Sisters", is at least 100-250 meters (328-820 feet).
 According to infrared images of the difference between night and day temperatures, they are most likely caves.
 During the day they are colder than the surrounding surface, and at night they are warmer.
 Their thermal characteristics are not as stable as those of larger caves on Earth, which often maintain nearly constant temperatures, but they are consistent with what are deep pits in the ground, said Glen Cushing of the U.S. Geological Survey and the University of Northern Arizona, located in Flagstaff, Ariz.
 In France, voting is traditionally carried out in a low-tech way: the voter closes himself in a booth and puts a pre-printed paper with the name of the candidate he has chosen into an envelope.
 After officials verify the voter's identity, he drops the envelope into the ballot box and signs the voter list.
 French election laws are quite strict in their procedures.
 Since 1988, ballot boxes must be transparent so that voters and observers can see that there are no envelopes inside at the beginning of the vote and that no other envelopes have been added, except those of the people who have been allowed to vote and whose votes have been counted properly.
 Candidates can send their representatives to monitor the process, and in the evening the votes are counted by volunteers under strict supervision according to a special procedure.
 The ASUS Eee PC series, previously introduced worldwide with a focus on factors such as cost-effectiveness and functionality, became a hot topic during the month of information technology in Taipei in 2007.
 But the consumer market for notebooks will change dramatically after the company ASUS was awarded the Taiwan Excellence Award for stability by the Executive Yuan of the Republic of China in 2007.
 The station's website describes the show as "a traditional radio theater with a new and outrageously grotesque vision!".
 In the early days of its existence, the show was broadcast only on the site of the long-running online radio TogiNet Radio, dedicated to radio conversations.
 At the end of 2015, TogiNet created AstroNet Radio as a subsidiary radio station.
 The show was originally voiced by amateur actors from East Texas.
 According to reports, the looting continued throughout the night as there were no law enforcement officers on the streets of Bishkek.
 Bishkek was described by one observer as descending into anarchy as groups of people ran through the streets and looted shops of consumer goods.
 Some of the residents of Bishkek accused the protesters from the south of lawlessness.
 South Africa defeated the All Blacks (New Zealand) in the Tri Nations Rugby Union Cup match at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in Rustenburg, South Africa.
 The final score was 21-20, ending the All Blacks' winning streak at 15 games.
 For "Springbox" this broke a five-match losing streak.
 This match was the last for the "All Blacks", who had already won the cup two weeks earlier.
 The final match of the season will be held at Ellis Park in Johannesburg next week, when the Springboks will play Australia.
 A moderate earthquake struck Monday in the western part of Montana at 10:08 p.m.
 The U.S. Geological Survey (USGS) and its National Earthquake Information Center have not received any reports of damage.
 The epicenter of the earthquake was about 20 km (15 miles) northeast of Dillon and about 65 km (40 miles) south of Butte.
 It was confirmed that the strain of bird flu H5N1, deadly to humans, was infected dead wild duck found Monday in a swamp near Leon in eastern France.
 France is the seventh EU country to be affected by the virus, after Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy.
 Cases with suspected H5N1 in Croatia and Denmark remain unconfirmed.
 Chambers sued God for "spreading death, destruction and fear to millions and millions of Earth's inhabitants."
 Agnostic Chambers claims that his lawsuit is "not serious" and "anyone can sue anyone."
 The story, told in the French opera by Camille Saint-Saëns, is about an artist "whose life is governed by his love of drugs and of Japan".
 As a result, the actors smoke joints on stage, and the theater itself encourages the audience to join in.
 Former Speaker of the House Newt Gingrich, Texas Governor Rick Perry and Congresswoman Michele Bachmann took fourth, fifth and sixth place respectively.
 After the results were announced, Gingrich praised Santorum, but harshly criticized Romney, whose campaign had been running negative ads against Gingrich in Iowa.
 Perry said he would return to Texas "to assess the results of today's party meeting and determine whether I should continue the race," but later said he would continue and would participate in the South Carolina primary on January 21.
 Bachmann, who won a straw poll in Ames, Iowa, in August, has decided to end her campaign.
 The photographer was taken to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center in Los Angeles, where he later died.
 He was reported to be between 20 and 30 years old. In a statement, Bieber said: "While I was not present at the tragic incident and have not been directly involved, my thoughts and prayers are with the family of the victim."
 The entertainment and news site TMZ believes the photographer stopped his car on the opposite side of Sepulveda Boulevard and tried to take pictures of the police stopping traffic before he crossed the road and continued.
 According to police, the driver of the car that hit the photographer will most likely not be charged with a crime.
 Given that only eighteen medals were awarded per day, some countries failed to make the podium.
 They include the Netherlands with Anna Jochemsen, who finished ninth in the women's race standing in the super-G, and Finland with Katja Saari, who finished tenth in the same race.
 Australian Mitchell Gourlay finished eleventh in the men's standing Super-G. Czech Ondrej Elinek finished sixteenth in the men's sitting Super-G.
 Arli Velasquez of Mexico finished 15th among men in the super-G in the sitting position. New Zealander Adam Hall finished ninth among men in the super-G in the standing position.
 Polish visually impaired skier Maciej Krezel and sports presenter Anna Ogarzynska finished thirteenth in the super-G. South Korean skier Pak Chon-Sok finished twenty-fourth in the super-G among men in a sitting position.
 UN peacekeepers who arrived in Haiti after the 2010 earthquake are accused of spreading a disease that started near their military camp.
 According to the lawsuit, waste from the UN camp was not properly sanitized, and bacteria entered the tributary of the Artibonite River, one of the largest in Haiti.
 Before the arrival of troops, the state of Haiti did not face problems related to this disease, since the beginning of the 19th century.
 The Haitian Institute for Justice and Democracy cited an independent study that suggests that the UN peacekeeping battalion from Nepal inadvertently brought the disease to Haiti.
 Daniel Lantian, a UN expert on the disease, said the outbreak was likely caused by peacekeepers.
 Hamilton confirmed that the patient was admitted to Howard University Hospital in stable condition.
 The patient visited Nigeria, where a number of cases of infection with the Ebola virus have been detected.
 The hospital followed infection control protocols, including keeping the patient in isolation to prevent possible infection of other patients.
 Before "The Simpsons", Simon worked in various positions on several shows.
 In the 1980s, he worked on such shows as "Taxi", "The Funny Company" and "The Tracey Ullman Show".
 In 1989, along with Brooks and Groening, he helped create "The Simpsons" and was responsible for the first team of writers for the series.
 Despite leaving the show in 1993, he remained an executive producer and continued to receive tens of millions of dollars in fees each season.
 Earlier, the Chinese news agency Xinhua reported that the plane had been hijacked.
 Later it was reported that the plane received a bomb threat and was diverted back to Afghanistan, landing in Kandahar.
 Early reports said the plane returned to Afghanistan after being denied an emergency landing in Urumqi.
 Air crashes are common in Iran, which uses an aging fleet that is poorly maintained for both civilian and military operations.
 International sanctions have made it impossible to buy new aircraft.
 Earlier this week, three people were killed and three injured in the crash of a police plane.
 Last year, Iran experienced its worst air disaster in years when a plane bound for Armenia crashed, killing 168 people on board.
 In the same month, another airliner rolled off the runway in Mashhad and crashed into a wall, killing seventeen people.
 Aerosmith canceled the remaining concerts of their tour.
 The band was supposed to tour the United States and Canada until September 16.
 They cancelled the tour after lead singer Steve Tyler suffered a fall from the stage during a concert on August 5.
 Murray lost the first set in a tie-break after both men saved every single service game in the set.
 Del Potro had an early advantage in the second set, but it also required a tie-break after reaching 6-6.
 At the moment, Potro has been given medical attention for his shoulder and has managed to return to the game.
 The program began at 8:30 pm local time (or 15:00 UTC).
 Renowned singers from all over the country performed bhajans or songs of devotion at the feet of Sri Shiam.
 The evening began with singer Sandhu Sharma, followed by Jay Shankar Chaudhary. He presented the chhappan bhog bhajan as well. He was accompanied by singer Raju Khandelwal.
 Then Lakha Singh took over the leadership in singing bhajans.
 Baba Shyam was served 108 plates of chapan bhog (in Hinduism - 56 different dishes, including sweets, fruits, nuts and other dishes, presented to the deity).
 Lakhha Singh performed the Chhappan Bhog Bhajan. The singer Raju Khandelwal sang along with him.
 Nintendo President Satoru Iwata unveiled the design of the new Nintendo Revolution game console at the main presentation of the "Tokyo Game Show" on Thursday.
 The controller, which looks like a TV remote, uses two sensors next to the user's TV to calculate his position in three-dimensional space.
 By moving the device in the air, players will be able to control actions and movements in video games.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car and finished the race shortly after the start.
 His teammate Fernando Alonso was the leader for most of the race, but ended it immediately after a pit stop, probably because of a badly stuck right front wheel.
 Michael Schumacher finished the race shortly after Alonso due to a suspension failure, which he had suffered during several overtaking attempts during the race.
 "She is very pretty and sings very well," he said, referring to the transcript of the press conference.
 "I was completely sincere every time we rehearsed it."
 About 3 minutes after launch, the onboard camera showed numerous pieces of insulation foam flying away from the fuel tank.
 However, it is assumed that they did not cause any damage to the shuttle.
 The head of NASA's shuttle program, N. Wayne Hale, said the foam came off "after a period of time that causes us concern."
 Five minutes before the start of the fireworks, the wind began to intensify, a minute later the wind reached 70 kilometers per hour... Then it started to rain, so hard and big that it was as if needles were falling on you, then hail fell from the sky, people screamed in panic and collided with each other.
 I lost my sister and her friend, and there were two disabled people in wheelchairs on my way, people just jumped over them and pushed them,” said Armand Versace.
 NHK also reported that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa Nuclear Power Plant, located in Niigata Prefecture, was operating in standard mode.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co. reported no damage from the quake, and said that reactors 1 and 2 at its Shika nuclear power plant were shut down.
 About 9,400 homes in the region are reported to be without water and about 100 without electricity.
 Some roads are damaged, the affected areas have been cut off from the railway and the airport in Ishikawa Prefecture is still closed.
 One of the bombs exploded near the office of the governor-general.
 Three more bombs exploded near government buildings within two hours.
 According to some reports, the official death toll is eight people, and official reports confirm that up to 30 people were injured; but the final figures are still unknown.
 In urine samples from animals that died after eating contaminated animal feed, both cyanuric acid and melamine were found.
 The University researchers reported that these two compounds react with each other to form crystals that can block the kidneys.
 During the observations, the researchers discovered crystalline formations that arise in cat urine when cyanuric acid and melamine are added.
 When comparing with infrared Fourier spectroscopy, it was found that the composition of these crystals corresponds to crystals found in the urine of affected animals.
 I don't know if you realize it or not, but most of the goods from Central America were brought into this country duty free.
 Nevertheless, eighty percent of our goods were taxed according to the tariffs in the Central American countries.
 It didn't seem to make sense to me; of course it wasn't fair.
 I tell people that they will be treated the way they treat others.
 California Governor Arnold Schwarzenegger signed a law banning the sale or rental of video games with violence to minors.
 The law requires that computer games with violence be sold in California with a sticker that says "18" and that the sale of games to minors be punishable by a $1,000 fine for each violation.
 This morning, Attorney General Kier Starmer, a distinguished Queen's Counsel, made a statement that criminal proceedings have been commenced against both Hughes and Price.
 Hughes resigned, and in the Cabinet of Ministers he will be replaced by a member of Parliament Ed Davey. It is expected that the member of Parliament Norman Lamb will take the post of Minister for Business Affairs belonging to Davey.
 Hughes and Price are due to appear at Westminster Magistrates' Court on February 16.
 The dead were Nicholas Alden, 25, and Zachary Caddebec, 21, who was the driver.
 Edgar Vegilla received injuries to his hand and jaw, while Christopher Schneider needed reconstructive surgery on his face.
 Uki's weapon malfunctioned when it was aimed at the fifth man's head. Schneider feels constant pain, he is blind in one eye, he has a part of his skull missing, and his face is reconstructed with titanium.
 Schneider testified via video link from his home in the United States.
 In addition to Wednesday's competition, Carpendale took part in two individual competitions at the championships.
 Her first competition was a slalom, in which she did not finish the first run, and 36 of the 116 competitors had the same result in that race.
 In another race, this time in the giant slalom, she finished tenth among the women in the sitting position with a combined time of 4:41.30. 2:11.60 minutes slower than the first-place Austrian Claudia Lechner and 1:09.02 minutes slower than the ninth-place Hungarian Dienci Danie.
 Four skiers in the women's sitting group failed to finish their runs, and 45 of 117 skiers in the giant slalom failed to finish the race.
 The Madhya Pradesh police have recovered the stolen laptop and mobile phone.
 Deputy Inspector General D. K. Arya said, "We have arrested five men who raped the Swiss woman and have recovered her mobile phone and laptop."
 The accused have names Babakandjar, Bhuktakandjar, Rampro Kandjar and Vishnukandjar.
 Police chief Chandra Shekhar Solanki said the accused were presented before the judges with their faces covered.
 Although there were three people inside the building at the time the car crashed into it, no one was injured.
 However, the driver received serious head injuries.
 The road where the accident occurred was temporarily closed while emergency services freed the driver from the red Audi TT.
 He was initially admitted to James Paget Hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was subsequently transferred to Addenbrooke's Hospital in Cambridge.
 Subsequently, the Edinburgh Sheriff Court charged Adekoye with the murder of her son.
 She is in custody awaiting charges and trial, but any testimony may be tainted because her popularity has been widely exploited by the media.
 This is common practice in other parts of the UK, but Scottish justice works differently, and the courts found the publication of the photos to be potentially damaging.
 Professor Pamela Ferguson of the University of Dundee notes that "journalists do seem to be treading a dangerous line in publishing photographs and other details of suspects."
 The Royal Prosecutor's Office, which is generally responsible for prosecuting, told reporters that no further comments would be made, at least until a guilty verdict is handed down.
 The document, according to the leak, will deal with the dispute over the borders that Palestine wants to establish on the basis of those that existed before the Six-Day War of 1967.
 Other topics reportedly include the future status of Jerusalem, which is sacred to both peoples, and the Jordan River valley.
 Israel demands a permanent military presence in the valley for ten years after the agreement is signed, while the PNA agrees to a five-year presence.
 The traps, which were used in the additional test for pests, had to be under the close supervision of rangers, because this test was conducted under observation and evaluated its effectiveness.
 As part of the partnership between NPWS and the NSW Sporting Shooters Association, a hunting program was run by the Association to recruit qualified volunteers.
 According to Mick O'Flynn, acting director of the Wildlife and National Parks Service's Wildlife Conservation and Heritage Division, the four shooters selected for the first shooting operation have undergone comprehensive training and safety briefings.
 Yesterday, Martelly swore in a new Provisional Electoral Council (CEP), consisting of nine members.
 This is the fifth CEP Martinez in four years.
 Last month, a presidential commission recommended that the previous interim electoral council resign as part of a package of measures to move the country toward new elections.
 The commission was Marcellus's response to the mass protests against the state regime that began in October.
 These sometimes violent protests were triggered by the failure to hold elections, some of which were due to be held as early as 2011.
 About 60 cases of overheating of defective iPod devices were reported, resulting in six fires and four people suffering minor burns.
 The Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) said it was aware of 27 cases involving the devices.
 Last week, the Ministry of Economy, Labor and Industry announced that Apple had informed it of 34 additional cases of overheating, which the company called "non-serious".
 In response, the ministry called Apple's delay in reporting the issue "very regrettable."
 At 7:19 a.m. local time (21:19 GMT on Friday) an earthquake struck in Mariana.
 The Northern Mariana Islands Emergency Management Office said there were no reports of damage in the country.
 The Pacific Tsunami Warning Center also said there were no signs of a tsunami.
 A former Filipino police officer hijacked a tour bus in Manila, the capital of the Philippines, and took Hong Kong tourists hostage.
 Rolando Mendoza fired his M16 rifle at the tourists.
 Several hostages were rescued, and at least six were confirmed dead at the time.
 Six hostages, including children and the elderly, were freed earlier, as were Filipino photographers.
 Later, photographers took the place of the elderly woman, as she went to the toilet. Mendoza was shot.
 Liggins followed in his father's footsteps and began a career in medicine.
 He trained as a midwife and began working at the National Women's Hospital in Auckland in 1959.
 When Liggins was working at the hospital, in his free time he began to investigate cases of premature birth.
 His research showed that if you introduce the hormone, it will enhance the maturation of the lungs of the child during the development of the fetus.
 According to Xinhua, on Wednesday, state investigators found two onboard recorders, or "black boxes."
 Fellow wrestlers also paid tribute to the Moon.
 Here's what Tommy Dreamer said: "Moon was the first Queen of Extreme. She was my first manager. Moon passed away on the night of the two moons. It's a unique event, just like she was. A strong woman."
 Dustin "Goldie" Rannells said, "The moon was as infected as I was... Maybe even more infected... I love her and I'm going to miss her... I hope she's in a better place."
 Of 1,400 people surveyed in the run-up to the 2010 federal election, the number of those opposed to Australia becoming a republic rose by 8 per cent since 2008.
 Acting Prime Minister Julia Gillard during the 2010 federal election campaign stated that Australia should become a republic after the reign of Queen Elizabeth II.
 34% of those surveyed share this view and want Queen Elizabeth II to be the last monarch of Australia.
 The survey showed the following: 29 percent of respondents believe that Australia should become a republic as soon as possible, and 31 percent believe that it does not need this form of government.
 The Olympic gold medallist was due to compete in the 100 and 200m freestyle and three relay events at the Commonwealth Games, but his fitness is now in doubt after he complained of illness.
 He was unable to take the pain medication he needed because it is banned in the Games.
 Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and professor of computer science at the University of Central Missouri, on January 25 discovered the largest prime number known to date.
 On Tuesday, it was announced that by early February, several people had confirmed this discovery using various hardware and software.
 Comets may have been the source of water delivery to Earth, as well as the source of organic compounds that can form proteins and support life.
 Scientists hope to understand how planets form, especially how Earth formed, because comets have been colliding with Earth for a very long time.
 Cuomo, 53, took office in early this year and signed a bill legalizing same-sex marriage last month.
 He called the rumors "political nonsense and nonsense."
 He is expected to run for president in 2016.
 NextGen is a system that, according to the U.S. Federal Aviation Administration, will allow planes to fly more direct routes and save millions of gallons of fuel and reduce carbon emissions each year.
 It uses satellite technology instead of the old technology based on ground-based radars, which will allow air traffic controllers to more accurately determine the position of aircraft and give pilots more accurate information.
 No additional transport has been brought to Wembley, there will not be any stopping of ground trains, and there are no parking lots and parking lots on the surface.
 Fears about a lack of transportation prompted speculation that the game might have to be played behind closed doors without fans.
 The study, published Thursday in the journal Science, describes the emergence of a new species of bird on the Ecuadorian Galapagos Islands.
 Researchers from Princeton University (USA) and Uppsala University (Sweden) reported that due to mating of the endemic Darwin's finch (Geospiza fortes) with the transplanted cactus finch (Geospiza conirostris), a new species evolved in just two generations, although it was believed that this process would take much longer.
 Gold can be given any shape. It can be cast into very small shapes.
 It can be drawn into a thin wire, which can be woven and plated. It can be forged or wound into rolls.
 It can be made very thin and attached to another metal. It can be made so thin that sometimes it was used to decorate hand-painted illustrations in books – a so-called "facsimile manuscript".
 This is called the pH of the chemical. You can make an indicator with the juice of red cabbage.
 Cabbage juice changes color depending on how acidic or alkaline the chemical is.
 The pH value is determined by the degree of saturation of hydrogen ions (H in pH) of the chemical compound being studied.
 Hydrogen ions are protons, from which electrons are separated (hydrogen atoms consist of one proton and one electron).
 Get a new mixture by mixing two dry powders in one container, and then with clean wet hands, form a ball from this mixture.
 The moisture on your hands will react with the top layer, which will be unusual, then a kind of shell will form.
 Almost every house in the cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-Daro had a toilet with a flush, connected to a complex sewage system.
 Remaining fragments of sewage systems have been discovered in the houses of Minoan cities on the islands of Crete and Santorini in Greece.
 Toilets were also in Ancient Egypt, Persia and China. In the Roman civilization, toilets were sometimes part of public baths, where men and women bathed together.
 When you call someone thousands of miles away, you use a satellite.
 The satellite in space receives the call and almost instantly reflects it back down.
 The satellite was delivered to space by a rocket. Scientists use telescopes in space because the Earth's atmosphere somewhat distorts our light and view.
 To launch a satellite or a telescope into space, a giant rocket is needed that is more than 100 feet tall.
 The wheel has changed our world in an incredible way. The most important thing that the wheel has given us is much easier and faster transportation.
 It gave us the train, the automobile, and many other vehicles.
 Under them are more medium-sized cats that eat prey ranging from rabbits to antelopes and deer.
 Finally, many small cats (including stray house cats) eat and hunt much smaller animals, such as insects, rodents, lizards, and birds.
 The secret of their success lies in the niche concept, the special work that each species of cat does, which keeps it from competing with others.
 Lions are the most social cats, living in large groups called prides.
 The pride consists of one to three adult males, who are related, as well as females and cubs, the number of which can reach thirty.
 Females are usually related to each other and form a large family of sisters and daughters.
 Lion prides behave very much like packs of wolves or dogs — animals that are remarkably similar in behavior to lions (but not other big cats) and also very dangerous to their prey.
 As a fully developed athlete, the tiger can climb trees (though not very well), swim, jump long distances, and pull with the strength of five strong men.
 The tiger belongs to the same genus (Panthera) as lions, leopards and jaguars. These four cats are the only ones that have the ability to roar.
 A tiger's roar is not like a lion's full-throated roar, but more like a string of disjointed words.
 Ocelots love to eat small animals. If the opportunity arises, they will catch monkeys, snakes, rodents and birds. Almost all the animals that the ocelot hunts are much smaller than him.
 Scientists believe that ocelots follow the trail of animals and find prey by smell, tracking its movements on the ground.
 They are able to see perfectly in the dark with night vision and almost imperceptibly move. Ocelots hunt prey, blending in with the environment, and then attack the prey.
 When a small group of living organisms (a small population) separates from the main population from which they came (for example, if they cross a mountain range or a river, or if they move to a new island from which they cannot easily return), they often find themselves in an environment that is different from the one they were in before.
 This new environment has different resources and different competitors, so the new population will need different characteristics or changes from what it had before in order to become a strong competitor.
 The original population has not changed at all - it still needs the same adaptations as before.
 Over time, as a new population begins to adapt to a new environment, it begins to look less and less like the rest of the population.
 Over time, through thousands or even millions of years, these two populations will look so different that it will be impossible to say that they are the same species.
 We call this process speciation, the origin of new species, and it is a necessary consequence and an essential part of evolution.
 Plants produce oxygen, which man breathes, and absorb carbon dioxide, which man exhales.
 Plants are powered by the sun through photosynthesis. They also cast shade.
 We build our homes and make our clothes from plants. Most of our food comes from plants. Without plants, animals could not survive.
 The mosasaur was the most fearsome predator of its time, so it was not afraid of anything except other mosasaurs.
 His long jaws were lined with more than 70 sharp teeth, in addition to an extra row on his palate, so that there was no escape for those who crossed his path.
 We don't know for sure, but it is not excluded that his tongue was divided. He fed on turtles, large fish, other mosasaurs, and could be a cannibal.
 He also attacked anything that came into the water; even a giant dinosaur like a Tyrannosaurus would not have been a match for him.
 Although most of their food would be familiar to us, the Romans did have some strange and unusual dishes, served at banquets. For example, boar, peacock, snails and a type of rodent called a hedgehog.
 There was another difference: while the poor people and the woman ate sitting on chairs, the rich liked to have joint feasts, during which they ate lying on their sides.
 The diet of the ancient Romans could not include products that came to Europe from America or Asia in subsequent centuries.
 In particular, they had no corn, tomatoes, potatoes, cacao, and no ancient Roman did not try turkey.
 The Babylonians built each of the gods a main sanctuary, which was considered the home of the god.
 People made sacrifices to the gods, and priests tried to please the gods in ceremonies and festivals.
 Each temple had an open courtyard and an inner sanctuary, which only priests could enter.
 Sometimes as elements of the temple were built special towers in the form of pyramids called "zikkurats".
 The top of the tower was a special sanctuary for the god.
 In the warm climate of the Middle East, the house was not particularly important.
 Much of the Jewish family’s life was spent outdoors.
 Women prepared in the courtyard; the shops were open counters that opened onto the street. For the construction of houses used stone.
 There were no large forests in the land of Canaan, so wood was extremely expensive.
 Greenland was sparsely inhabited. In the Scandinavian sagas, it is told that Erik the Red was expelled from Iceland for murder, and, moving further west, he discovered Greenland and gave it its name.
 But regardless of his discovery, there were already Eskimo tribes living there at the time.
 Although each of the countries was Scandinavian, there were many differences between the peoples, rulers, traditions, and histories of Denmark, Sweden, Norway, and Iceland.
 If you saw the movie "National Treasure", you might think that the Declaration of Independence has a map of treasures on the back.
 However, this is not true. Although something is written on the back of the document, it is not a treasure map.
 On the back of the Declaration of Independence it says: "The unanimous Declaration of the thirteen United States of America." The text is written at the bottom of the document and upside down.
 Although no one knows for sure who wrote it, it is known that at the beginning of its existence this large parchment document (29¾ by 24½ inches) was rolled up for easier storage.
 So it is quite likely that the entry was added simply as a note.
 As a result of Operation Neptune and subsequent battles, the north of France was liberated, but the south was not yet liberated.
 It was run by the "Vichy" French, who made peace with the Germans in 1940 and worked with the invaders instead of fighting them.
 On August 15, 1940, the Allies invaded southern France. The invasion was called "Operation Dragoon".
 In just two weeks, the Free French and the Americans liberated southern France and headed towards Germany.
 Civilization is a separate culture, the bearers of which is a fairly large group of people living and working together, society.
 The word "civilization" comes from the Latin civilis, which means "citizen" and is a relative of the Latin words civis, meaning "citizen", and civitas, meaning "city" or "city-state", and it also expresses the size of society in some way.
 City-states are the precursors of nations. Civilizational culture implies the transmission of knowledge across several generations, a continuous cultural presence and a transmissible spread.
 Small cultures often disappear without leaving historical evidence, and therefore cannot be recognized as authentic civilizations.
 During the American Revolutionary War, thirteen states, in accordance with the Articles of Confederation, formed a weak central government, the only body of which was the Congress.
 Congress had no taxing powers, and since there was no national executive or judicial authority, it relied on the cooperation of the states, which often refused to cooperate and refused to enforce its acts.
 He also had no authority to repeal state tax laws and tariffs.
 To amend, according to the articles, requires the unanimous approval of all the states, but the states have been so irresponsible to the central government that their representatives are often absent.
 The Italian national football team, along with the German, is the second most successful team in the world and won the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 Popular sports include football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby, cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey and Formula One auto racing.
 Winter sports are most popular in the northern regions. The inhabitants of these regions of Italy participate in international competitions and the Olympics.
 Japan has approximately 7,000 islands (the largest of which is Honshu), making it the 7th largest island in the world!
 Due to its membership in the cluster/group of islands, Japan is often called an archipelago from a geographical point of view.
 Taiwan has its origins many years ago, in the 15th century, when European sailors passing by recorded the name of the island as Ilha Formosa, or "beautiful island".
 In 1624, the Dutch East India Company established a base on the southwest of Taiwan, initiating a transformation of aboriginal methods of rice production and hiring Chinese workers to work on their rice and sugar plantations.
 In 1683, the Qing dynasty (1644-1912) took control of western and northern coastal areas of Taiwan and in 1885 declared Taiwan a province of the Qing Empire.
 In 1895, after the defeat in the Sino-Japanese war (1894-1895), the Qing government signed the Treaty of Shimonoseki, which ceded the rights to Taiwan to Japan, which ruled the island until 1945.
 Machu Picchu consists of three main structures, namely Intihuatana, the Temple of the Sun and the Room of the Three Windows.
 Most of the buildings on the edges of the complex have been rebuilt to give tourists a more accurate idea of how they looked originally.
 By 1976, 30% of Machu Picchu had been restored. Restoration work continues to this day.
 For example, the world’s most common format for static photography is 35mm, and that was the dominant film size at the end of the analogue era.
 It is still produced today, but more importantly, it has inherited the aspect ratio of digital camera images.
 The 35mm format is actually somewhat confusing, it has a width of 36mm and a height of 24mm.
 The aspect ratio of this format (divided by twelve to get a ratio with small integers) is therefore taken to be 3:2.
 Many common formats (e.g. the APS family) are equal to or close to these ratios.
 Too often used and often ridiculed rule of thirds is a simple recommendation that creates dynamism while maintaining a certain degree of order in the image.
 It says that the best place to put the main object is at the intersection of the lines dividing the image into three parts vertically and horizontally (see example).
 During this period of European history, the Catholic Church, which had become rich and powerful, was the object of close attention.
 For more than a thousand years, Christianity united European states despite differences in languages and traditions.
 Her all-pervasive power touched everyone - from the king to the commoner.
 One of the main Christian principles is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and that church funds exist for this purpose.
 The center of church authority was based in Rome for more than a thousand years, and such a concentration of power and wealth led many to question whether this doctrine was being observed.
 Shortly after the beginning of hostilities, Britain imposed a naval blockade of Germany.
 This strategy proved effective in cutting off vital military and civilian supplies, though the blockade violated universally accepted international laws, as set forth in several international agreements over the past two hundred years.
 Britain has mined international waters to prevent ships from entering entire sectors of the oceans, putting even neutral vessels at risk.
 Since the reaction to this tactic was muted, Germany expected a similar reaction to its unimpeded submarine warfare.
 Among most citizens and nations in the 1920s, there were prevailing sentiments such as pacifism and isolationism.
 Having experienced the horrors and atrocities of the First World War, states wanted to avoid a similar situation in the future.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States and accepted an offer to work for the Edison Company in New York City.
 He arrived in the United States with four cents in his pocket, a book of poetry, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor, who had been his boss at his previous job, to Thomas Edison.
 In ancient China, a unique way of indicating periods of time was used; each period of China or each family that was in power, was a particular dynasty.
 In addition, between the reigns of each dynasty there was fragmentation and instability. The most famous was the Three Kingdoms period, which lasted 60 years during the Han and Jin dynasties.
 During this period there were fierce military actions between many noble people fighting for the throne.
 The Three Kingdoms era was one of the bloodiest periods in ancient Chinese history, with thousands of people dying in battles to fight for a place on the throne in the grand palace in Xi'an.
 There are many such social and political effects, such as the use of the metric system, the transition from absolutism to republicanism, nationalism, and the belief that the country belongs to the people, not to a single ruler.
 Also after the Revolution, opportunities for work were opened to all men, which allowed the most ambitious and talented to succeed.
 The same thing applies to the army, because the ranks were based on qualities rather than on origin.
 The French Revolution also inspired many other oppressed working class people in other countries to start their own revolutions.
 Muhammad was very interested in topics unrelated to worldly life, and he often visited a cave that became known as "Hira" on the mountain "Nur" (light) for reflection.
 Well, the cave that has survived to the present day gives us a very vivid idea of Muhammad's spiritual aspirations.
 The cave is located at the top of a mountain to the north of Mecca and is completely isolated from the rest of the world.
 It is very difficult to find even for those who know about its existence. In the cave, a person is in complete isolation.
 There is nothing to see but the pure beauty of the sky above and the surrounding mountains. From the depths of the cave, you can only see and hear a very small part of this world.
 The Great Pyramid of Giza is the only one of the Seven Wonders of the Ancient World that still exists today.
 The Great Pyramid was built by the Egyptians in the third century BC and is one of many large pyramid-shaped structures built to honor the pharaoh.
 The Giza Plateau, or the Giza Necropolis, in the Egyptian Valley of the Kings, includes several pyramids (of which the Great Pyramid of Giza is the largest), several smaller tombs, several temples, and the Great Sphinx.
 The Great Pyramid was built in honor of Pharaoh Khufu, and many smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built in honor of Khufu's wives and relatives.
 The upward-facing V sign looks like a V, and the downward-facing V sign looks like an X or a square without a bottom.
 "Up" means you should start at the tip and draw the bow forward, and "down" means you should start at the place where your hand holds the bow and draw it back.
 The upward movement of the bow produces a softer sound, while the downward movement produces a stronger and more forceful sound.
 You can draw your own staves, but remember that the staves are printed for musical reasons, and they usually have to be followed.
 On October 6, 1789, an angry mob of women from the market forced King Louis XVI, Queen Marie-Antoinette, their two young children (11-year-old Marie-Thérèse and 4-year-old Louis-Charles) and the king's sister, Madame Élisabeth, to return to Paris from Versailles.
 They returned to Paris in a carriage, surrounded by a crowd of people who shouted threats to the king and queen.
 The crowd of people made the King and Queen open the windows wide.
 At one point, one of the crowd waved a royal guard's head, killed in Versailles in front of the frightened queen.
 The military expenditures of American imperialism to conquer the Philippines were paid for by the Filipinos themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the American colonial regime to cover most of the expenses and interest on the bond issues moved on behalf of the Philippine government through Wall Street banking houses.
 Of course, the superprofits derived from the long exploitation of the Filipinos were the main source of income of American imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, one must understand the context that prompted their creation.
 The era in which these events took place is commonly referred to as the High Middle Ages, the period of European history covering the 11th, 12th, and 13th centuries (1000–1300 CE).
 The High Middle Ages succeeded the earlier Middle Ages and preceded the Late Middle Ages, which, according to the accepted view, ended around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a term encompassing a wide range of practical ideas, from technological progress or technological imperative to the strict view that the fates of humans are governed by a fundamental logic related to the laws of science and their manifestation in technology.
 Most views of technological determinism share two general ideas: that the direction of technological development is virtually impervious to cultural or political influence, and that, in turn, the "effects" of technology on society are caused by the technology itself, rather than by society.
 For example, one could say that the automobile is a necessary cause of the development of roads.
 However, a nationwide road network is economically unfeasible for only a small group of vehicles, so new manufacturing methods are being developed to reduce the cost of ownership.
 Mass ownership of cars also leads to an increase in the number of road accidents, which leads to the invention in health care of new methods of treating injuries.
 Romanticism in many ways included cultural determinism, drawn from writers such as Goethe, Fichte, and Schlegel.
 In the context of romanticism, geography shaped people, and over time, customs and culture arose that, being in harmony with the place of residence of this society, were better than arbitrarily imposed laws.
 Just as Paris is called the capital of fashion in the modern world, so Constantinople was considered the capital of fashion in the feudal Europe.
 His fame as a center of luxury began around 400 AD and lasted until about 1100 AD.
 Its status declined during the twelfth century, mainly because the Crusaders returned with goods such as silk and spices that were more highly valued than the goods offered in the Byzantine markets.
 At this point, the title of Fashion Capital was transferred from Constantinople to Paris.
 The Gothic style reached its peak between the 10th and 11th centuries and the 14th century.
 At first, clothing was strongly influenced by Byzantine culture in the east.
 However, due to the slow channels of communication, styles in the west may lag behind by 25-30 years.
 Own styles began to develop in Western Europe by the end of the Middle Ages. One of the greatest achievements of the time, thanks to the Crusades, was the use of buttons to fasten clothing.
 Natural farming is farming that is done for the production of sufficient food to meet the needs of only the farmer and his/her family.
 Natural farming is a simple, often organic, system of agriculture using seeds from plants that grow in the given ecosystem, along with crop rotation and other relatively simple methods of increasing crop yields.
 Historically, most farmers have been engaged in agriculture for subsistence, and this is still the case in many developing countries.
 Subcultures unite like-minded people who feel oppressed by society's standards, and allow such people to define themselves.
 Subcultures may vary according to age, nationality, social class, location, and/or gender of the people who make it up.
 The characteristics that define a subculture as distinct may be linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, geographic, or a combination of factors.
 Members of a subculture often declare their membership through a distinctive and symbolic use of style, including fashion, manners, and slang.
 One of the most common methods used to illustrate the importance of socialization is to illustrate a few unfortunate cases where children, due to lack of attention, unfortunate circumstances, or deliberate abuse, did not have contact with adults during their growing up.
 Such children are called "feral" or "wild". Some feral children were isolated by humans (usually their own parents). In some cases, such rejection of their child was the result of the parents' inability to accept their child's serious intellectual or physical disability.
 Children living on the streets may have experienced severe forms of abuse or trauma before running away or being abandoned.
 Others, it is claimed, were reared by animals; some of them lived in the wild on their own.
 If he is fully raised by animals instead of humans, a feral child will display behaviors (within physical limits) that are almost identical to the animal that raised him — for example, his fear or indifference to humans.
 While project-based learning should be easier and more interesting, scaffolding is ahead of many technologies.
 Scaffolding is not a teaching method, but rather a form of assistance to those going through a new learning experience, such as using a new computer program or starting a new project.
 Scaffolding can be both virtual and real. In other words, a teacher is a form of scaffolding, but so is Clippy in Microsoft Office.
 Virtual scaffolding, which helps in learning, is built into the software and is designed to remind, explain, and ask questions about procedures that the learner might find too difficult to handle alone.
 Children are placed under guardianship for a variety of reasons, from abandonment to abuse and even extortion.
 Children should not grow up in an environment where there is no education, care and education, but grow up.
 We consider the foster care system safe for children.
 Our foster care system should provide safe housing, loving foster parents, stable education and reliable health care.
 Foster care should provide for all the needs that were lacking in the home from which they were removed.
 The Internet combines elements of both mass and interpersonal communications.
 The distinctive features of the Internet lead to additional scales in terms of approach and satisfaction.
 For example, it has been suggested that "learning" and "socialization" are important motivating factors for Internet use (James et al., 1995).
 "Personal involvement" and "long-term contact" were also named by Eimme and McCorvard (1998) as new dimensions of motivation when they studied how people respond to web sites.
 The use of video recordings has led to important discoveries in the field of interpretation of microexpressions - movements of the face lasting a few milliseconds.
 In particular, it is argued that it is possible to determine whether a person is lying by correctly interpreting his micro-expressions.
 In the article "President's Speech" Oliver Sacks described how people who are unable to understand speech due to brain damage can nevertheless correctly assess the sincerity of the speaker.
 According to his assumption, such abilities to interpret human behavior can have animals, for example, domestic dogs.
 Studies conducted in the twentieth century showed that there are two types of genetic variability: hidden and expressed.
 Mutation introduces new genetic variation, while selection eliminates it from the set of manifest variations.
 Segregation and recombination with each generation shuffle the variations between the two pools.
 In the savannah, primates with a digestive system like humans have difficulty meeting their amino acid needs from available plant resources.
 Moreover, failure to do so will lead to serious consequences such as slow growth, malnutrition and, ultimately, death.
 The most readily available plant resources would be the nuts found in leaves and legumes, but these are poorly digested by primates such as ourselves if not cooked.
 In contrast, animal food (ants, termites, eggs) is not only easily digestible, but also a rich source of protein, containing all the essential amino acids.
 Given all this, it is not surprising that our ancestors solved the "protein problem" in much the same way as chimpanzees in the savannah do today.
 Sleep interruption is the process of deliberately waking up during normal sleep and falling asleep again shortly afterwards (10–60 minutes).
 This can be easily done with a relatively quiet alarm clock to bring you to consciousness without waking you up completely.
 If you find yourself re-setting the alarm clock in your dream, then you can place it on the other side of the room, which will force you to get out of bed to turn it off.
 Other options that are based on biological rhythms include drinking large amounts of liquid (particularly water or tea, a known diuretic) before bed, which causes the person to wake up to urinate.
 The amount of inner peace of a person is inversely proportional to the amount of tension in his body and soul.
 The lower the voltage, the more positive the life force present in you. Every human being is potentially given the opportunity to find absolute peace and a sense of fulfillment.
 Anyone can achieve enlightenment. The only thing that stands in the way of this goal is our own tension and negative attitude.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha, but has been supplemented by the Mahayana path of love and a variety of techniques of Indian yoga.
 The principle of Tibetan Buddhism is very simple: it consists of Kundalini Yoga, meditation and the way of all-embracing love.
 The energy of kundalini (the energy of enlightenment) in kundalini yoga is awakened through yoga poses, breathing exercises, mantras and visualizations.
 The heart of Tibetan meditation is Yoga of Deities. By visualizing various deities, the energy channels are cleaned, the chakras are activated, and the enlightenment of consciousness is achieved.
 Germany was the common enemy in World War II, which led to cooperation between the USSR and the United States. After the war, disagreements about the system, process and culture led to discord between the countries.
 Two years after the end of the war, the former allies became enemies, and the Cold War began.
 It was to last the next 40 years. It was fought in earnest, using proxy armies, on battlefields from Africa to Asia, in Afghanistan, in Cuba, and in many other places around the world.
 By 17 September 1939, the Polish defences had already been breached, and the only hope was to retreat and reorganise along the Romanian bridgehead.
 However, these plans became moot almost overnight when about 800,000 soldiers from the Soviet Red Army formed the Belorussian and Ukrainian fronts after the seizure of eastern regions of Poland in violation of the Riga Peace Treaty, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact, and other international agreements, bilateral and multilateral.
 The use of ships to transport goods is certainly the most efficient way to transport large numbers of people and goods across oceans.
 The job of seamen has traditionally been to ensure a country's ability to move its people and goods, while at the same time preventing an enemy from moving its people and goods.
 One of the most notable recent examples of this was the company in the North Atlantic during World War II. The Americans tried to transport people and materials across the Atlantic to help Britain.
 At the same time, the German Navy, using mostly its submarines, tried to stop this movement.
 If the anti-Hitler coalition had failed, Germany would most likely have been able to conquer Britain as well as the rest of Europe.
 Goats were first domesticated about 10,000 years ago in the Zagros Mountains of Iran.
 Ancient cultures and tribes began to keep them for themselves to have milk, wool, meat and fur.
 Domestic goats were usually kept in herds that roamed the hills or other grazing areas, which were often watched over by children or teenagers, who were often called goatherds, a practice that is still common today.
 Roads for carriages were built in England in the XVI century.
 Although the wagon roads were merely parallel rows of wooden logs, they allowed horses to carry larger loads and at a faster speed than the slightly more rutted roads of the time.
 Sleepers were first used quite a long time ago to keep the rails in place, but it was later discovered that the tracks were more effective with an iron plate on top.
 This became common practice, but the iron caused more wear on wooden wheels of the cars.
 Over time, wooden wheels were replaced by iron ones. In 1767, the first rails made entirely of iron appeared.
 The first known form of transportation was walking, humans began walking directly two million years ago with the appearance of Homo Erectus (which means straight man).
 For their ancestors, the Australopithecines, bipedalism was not so common.
 Bipedal specializations are found in Australopithecus fossils from 4.2–3.9 million years ago, though perhaps Sahelanthropus walked upright as early as 7 million years ago.
 We can start living more environmentally friendly lives. We can become members of the environmental movement and even become activists to alleviate the suffering a little.
 It is usually like treating the symptoms. If we need not just a temporary solution, then we need to find the root of the problem and eliminate it.
 It is obvious that the world has changed a lot under the influence of scientific and technological progress of mankind, and due to overpopulation and extravagant lifestyle of people, the problems have become more serious.
 After the Congress's adoption on July 4, a handwritten draft signed by Congress President John Hancock and Secretary Charles Thomson was sent a few blocks to John Dunlap's printing shop.
 150–200 copies were made overnight, now known as the "Danlap leaflets".
 The first public reading of this document was made by John Nixon in the yard of Independence Hall on July 8.
 On July 6, one copy was sent to George Washington, who on July 9 ordered it to be read to his troops in New York. A copy arrived in London on August 10.
 The 25 known Dulles Leaflets are the oldest surviving copies of the document. The original manuscript copy has not survived.
 Today, many paleontologists believe that one of the groups of dinosaurs survived and lived to our days. We call them birds.
 They are often not considered to be dinosaurs because they have feathers and are capable of flight.
 But there is still much to say about birds that still look like dinosaurs.
 They have claws and nails on their paws, they lay eggs and walk on their hind legs like T-Rex.
 Almost all computers that are used today are based on the processing of information that is encoded in the form of binary numbers.
 A binary number can have only one of two values, either 0 or 1. These numbers are called "binary digits" or "bits" if you're using computer jargon.
 It may be difficult to immediately identify oral poisoning. Symptoms such as vomiting are too general to make a quick diagnosis.
 The best sign of internal poisoning may be the presence of an open container of medicine or a toxic household chemical.
 Refer to the label for specific instructions on first aid for this particular poison.
 The term "beetle" is used by entomologists formally to refer to the group of insects.
 This concept comes from the well-known bedbugs – insects that are well adapted to parasitizing humans.
 Both the predators and bedbugs are nesting species, adapted to live in the nest or dwelling of their host.
 In the United States, approximately 400,000 cases of multiple sclerosis (MS) have been identified, making MS the leading neurological disease of young adults and middle-aged people.
 Multiple sclerosis is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which is made up of the brain, spinal cord and optic nerve.
 Studies have shown that more women than men suffer from multiple sclerosis.
 A couple may decide that raising a child is not in their best interest or in the best interest of their child.
 These couples can choose to create an adoption plan for their child.
 When adoption or foster care occurs, the biological parents give up their parental rights so that another couple can adopt the child.
 The main goal of science is to find out how the world works, using the scientific method. This method is the basis of most scientific research.
 He, however, is not the only one. Scientific research is also guided by experimentation (an experiment is a test used to eliminate one or more possible hypotheses), asking questions, and making observations.
 Naturalists and philosophers focused their attention on the ancient texts and especially on the Bible in Latin.
 In all scientific matters, including psychology, the views of Aristotle were accepted.
 As knowledge of the Greek language deteriorated, the West was cut off from its philosophical and scientific Greek roots.
 Many of the rhythms in physiology and behavior are often to a large extent dependent on the presence of endogenous cycles and their production by biological clocks.
 Periodic rhythms, not simply a response to external periodic stimuli, have been recorded in most living organisms, including bacteria, fungi, plants and animals.
 Biological clocks are self-sustaining oscillators that will continue to autonomously oscillate for a period of time even in the absence of external stimuli.
 The Hershey and Chase experiment was one of the first suggestions that DNA is the genetic material.
 Hersh and Cheeze implanted their DNA into a bacterium with the help of phages, i.e. viruses.
 They conducted two experiments, labeling radioactive phosphorus DNA phage and radioactive black phage protein.
 Mutations can produce a wide variety of results, depending on the type of mutation, the importance of the affected section of genetic material, and whether the mutated cells are germline cells.
 Only mutations in the cells of the germ line can be passed on to children, while mutations elsewhere can lead to cell death or cancer.
 Nature tourism is of interest to those who like to go to nature to enjoy the landscape, including wild animals and plants.
 Among the examples of active recreation at the site are hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching, visiting parks and learning about the ecosystem.
 An example of this is visiting, photographing and studying orangutans in Borneo.
 Every morning people leave small towns in the countryside to go to their place of work, while those whose place of work is in the place they have just left pass by them.
 In this active transportation movement, everyone in some way or another is connected to and supports a personal automobile-based transportation system.
 Now science indicates that the vast hydrocarbon economy has affected one of the stable states of the biosphere that has supported human evolution for the last two million years.
 Everyone is a member of society and uses transportation systems. Practically everyone complains about these systems.
 In developed countries, you rarely hear such complaints about water quality or collapsing bridges.
 Why are transportation systems so prone to failure? Are transportation engineers simply incompetent, or are there more fundamental reasons?
 The study of the movement of individual drivers and vehicles between two points and their interaction with each other is carried out within the framework of the study of traffic flows.
 Unfortunately, it is difficult to study the intensity of traffic because you can not predict the behavior of the driver with one hundred percent probability.
 Fortunately, the behavior of drivers is often quite systematic; thus, traffic flows in general have some systematicity and can be approximated mathematically.
 To better represent the traffic flow, the relationships between three main variables were established:  (1) flow, (2) density, and (3) speed.
 These relationships help in planning, designing and operating railway facilities.
 Insects were the first animals to take to the air, and their ability to fly helped them escape predators, find food and find mates.
 Most insects have the ability to fold their wings along their body, which gives them an advantage.
 This provides them with more hiding places in which to hide from predators.
 Dragonflies and damselflies are the only insects that cannot fold their wings back.
 Thousands of years ago, a man named Aristarchus said that the solar system revolves around the Sun.
 Many believed him to be right, but many believed the opposite: that the Solar System revolved around the Earth, including the Sun (and even other stars).
 This seems like a reasonable idea, because we don't feel that the Earth is moving, do we?
 The Amazon River is the second longest and the largest river on Earth, carrying more than eight times the water of the second largest river.
 The Amazon is also the widest river on Earth, with a width that sometimes reaches six miles.
 As much as 20 percent of the water that flows from the rivers of our planet into the oceans comes from the Amazon.
 The Amazon River is 6,387 km (3,980 mi) long. It is fed by thousands of smaller rivers.
 Although the construction of pyramids of stone continued until the end of the Old Kingdom, the size and technical perfection of the pyramids at Giza was never surpassed.
 In the new kingdom of the ancient Egyptians, they admired the monuments created by their predecessors more than a thousand years earlier.
 The Vatican City has a population of about 800 people, making it the smallest independent country in the world, as well as the country with the smallest population.
 The Vatican uses Italian in its legislation and official communications.
 Italian is also the everyday language for most people working in the state, while Latin is often used in religious ceremonies.
 All citizens of the Vatican are Catholics.
 Humans have known the basic chemical elements, such as gold, silver and copper, since ancient times, because they can be found in nature in their pure form and are relatively easy to extract with primitive tools.
 The philosopher Aristotle believed that everything was made up of a mixture of one or more of four elements: earth, water, air, and fire.
 They were like four states of matter (in the same order): solid, liquid, gaseous and plasma, though he also suggested that they transition into a new state to make what we see.
 Alloys are essentially a mixture of two or more metals. Remember that there are many elements in the periodic table.
 Elements such as calcium and potassium are considered metals, of course, there are also metals such as silver and gold.
 It is also possible to make alloys that contain small amounts of non-metallic elements such as carbon.
 Everything in the universe is made of matter. All matter is made of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are so incredibly tiny that trillions of them can fit into the point at the end of this sentence.
 Thus, the pencil became a good friend for many people when it appeared.
 It is sad that when new writing methods appeared, the pencil lost its former status and was used less.
 Now people write messages on computer screens, and they never have to deal with a typewriter.
 One can only guess what will happen to the keyboard, with the advent of more new technologies.
 The atomic bomb works on the principle that in order for many protons and neutrons to be in one nucleus, energy is needed.
 It's like pushing a heavy cart up a hill. Then the re-splitting of the nucleus releases some of that energy.
 Some atoms have unstable nuclei, which means that they tend to decay with little or no outside influence.
 The surface of the Moon is made of rocks and dust. The outer layer of the Moon is called the crust.
 The thickness of the crust is about 70 km under the oceans and 100 km under the continents.
 It is thinner under the lunar seas and thicker under the highlands.
 The visible side may have more lunar seas because the crust is thinner there. Lava was easier to rise to the surface.
 Content theories focus on finding what makes people act or what might interest them.
 These theories suggest that people have certain needs and/or desires that accumulate inside them as they grow up.
 These theories address what causes particular people to want to do what they do, and what causes their environment to cause them to do or not do certain things.
 Two popular theories about content are Maslow's Hierarchy of Needs and Herzberg's Two-Factor Theory of Motivation.
 Typically, there are two types of behavior when managers begin to lead people who were previously their equals. One extreme of the spectrum is to try to remain "one of the guys" (or "one of the girls").
 Such managers find it difficult to make unpopular decisions, take disciplinary measures, evaluate the results of work, distribute responsibilities and hold employees accountable.
 At the other end of the spectrum, a person becomes an unrecognizable individual who feels that he must change everything that the team did and take it for himself.
 After all, the leader is ultimately responsible for the success or failure of the team.
 Such behavior often leads to conflicts between leaders and other members of the team.
 Virtual teams adhere to the same standards of excellence as traditional teams, but there are some minor differences.
 Virtual team members often serve as a point of contact for their immediate physical group.
 They are usually more autonomous than employees from traditional teams, because their teams can meet according to different time zones, which the local management may not always understand.
 The presence of a real "invisible team" (Larson and LaFasto, 1989, p. 109) is also a unique component of the virtual team.
 The "invisible team" is the team of managers, before which every participant reports. The invisible team sets the norms for each participant.
 Why would an organization go through the laborious process of creating a self-learning organization? One of the goals of applying the concepts of self-learning organizations in practice is innovation.
 When all available resources are effectively used in all functional areas of the organization, creativity and ingenuity can be unleashed.
 In the end, the concerted work of the organization to overcome the obstacle can lead to a new innovative process, which will meet the interests of the client.
 Before an organization can become innovative, leaders must create a culture of innovation, knowledge sharing and learning.
 Angel (2006) explains Continuum as a method used to help organizations achieve higher levels of effectiveness.
 The data of neurobiology give physical evidence for a theoretical approach to the study of consciousness, thus narrowing the field of research and making it much more precise.
 The relationship between brain pathology and behavior is used by scientists in their research.
 It has long been known that various types of damage, trauma, injury and brain tumors affect behavior and cause changes in some psychological functions.
 The emergence of new technologies allows us to see and explore previously unseen brain structures and processes.
 This provides us with a large amount of data and materials to create simulation models that help us understand the processes that occur in our minds.
 Although AI is strongly associated with science fiction, it is a very important area of computer science that studies the behavior and learning of machines and "teaching" them intelligence.
 AI research involves creating machines that automate tasks that require intelligent behavior.
 Here are some of the examples that can be given: control, planning and creation of a schedule, reaction to diagnoses and questions of the client, as well as recognition of the face, handwriting and voice.
 Such questions are dealt with in separate disciplines, the aim of which is to solve the problems we encounter in everyday life.
 Nowadays, AI is often used in the fields of economics, medicine, engineering and the military sphere, being embedded in some software applications for home computers and video games.
 Field trips are very important for any class. Very often teachers want to take their students to places that cannot be reached by bus.
 Technology offers a solution with virtual tours. Students can tour museum exhibits, visit an aquarium, or enjoy fine art, all while sitting with their class.
 Posting a tour in a virtual space for all to see is also a great way to refresh the tour in your memory and share your knowledge with future classes.
 For example, each year students at Bennett High School in North Carolina create a website about their visit to the state capital, and each year the site is updated, but access to older versions is still preserved - they serve as a memorable album.
 Blogs can also improve writing skills in students. Although students often start their blog using sloppy grammar and spelling, this usually changes due to the presence of an audience.
 Since students are often the most critical audience, the blog author begins to strive for improvement of his writing in order to avoid criticism.
 Also, by blogging, "students begin to better understand the world around them." Students are inspired to be smart and interesting, attracting the attention of readers (Toto, 2004).
 Blogging is a tool that fosters collaboration, and it motivates students to extend the learning process far beyond the traditional school day.
 Proper use of blogs can enable students to become more analytical and critical. By actively responding to Internet materials, students can define their position in the context of other people's work, as well as express their own views on specific issues (Oravec, 2002).
 Ottawa is a lovely bilingual capital of Canada with a huge number of art galleries and museums that open the past and present of Canada.
 Further south is the Niagara Falls, and the north is the domain of unspoiled natural beauty of Muskoka and surrounding areas.
 All of this and more makes Ontario something truly Canadian in the eyes of foreigners.
 Large areas further north are sparsely inhabited, and some are virtually uninhabited wilderness.
 Amazing population comparison: there are more African Americans in the U.S. than there are citizens in Canada.
 The East African islands are in the Indian Ocean off the east coast of Africa.
 Madagascar is much larger than the others and is a unique continent in terms of wildlife.
 Almost all the smaller islands are independent states or associated with France and are known as luxurious beach resorts.
 The Arabs also brought Islam to the region, especially it took root on the Comoros and Mayotte.
 The spread of European influence and colonization began in the 15th century, when Portuguese explorer Vasco da Gama discovered a route through the Cape of Good Hope from Europe to India.
 In the north, the region is bounded by the Sahel, and in the south and west by the Atlantic Ocean.
 For women: all tourists are advised to say that they are married, regardless of their actual marital status.
 It is also useful to wear a ring (but not too expensive looking).
 Women should be aware that because of cultural differences, they may feel harassed, followed, touched, etc.
 Firmly refuse men and do not be afraid to stand up for yourself (this is unacceptable regardless of cultural differences!).
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the 10th century BC. It was used by the Romans, Phoenicians and the Merinids as a strategic port, called Anfa.
 The Portuguese destroyed it and rebuilt it under the name of Kaz-Branca, but left it after the earthquake of 1755.
 Sultan of Morocco rebuilt the city under the name of Ed-Dar-el-Bayda, and Spanish traders, who created trading bases here, called it Casablanca.
 Casablanca is one of the least interesting places for shopping in all of Morocco.
 Around the old medina it is easy to find places where traditional Moroccan goods are sold, such as tajines, pottery, leather goods, hookahs and a whole range of trinkets, but all of this is for tourists.
 Goma is a tourist town in the very east of the Democratic Republic of the Congo, on the border with Rwanda.
 In 2002, the city of Goma was destroyed by the lava of the Nyiragongo volcano, which buried most of the city's streets, especially the central part of the city.
 Although Goma is a fairly safe place, it is advisable to check in advance about any trips outside Goma to understand the state of the fighting in the North Kivu Province.
 This town is also the starting point for climbing Mount Nyiragongo, and you can also see mountain gorillas in the wild at one of the cheapest rates in Africa.
 You can go by boda-boda (motorcycle taxi). The usual (local) price is 500 Congolese francs for a short trip.
 Due to its relative inaccessibility, Timbuktu became a metaphor for the exotic farthest land.
 Today, Timbuktu is a poor city, but its reputation attracts tourists, and it has an airport.
 In 1990, it was added to the list of World Heritage in Danger due to the threat posed by the sands of the desert.
 When filming the program Henry Louis Gates "Wonders of the African World" on the PBS channel, one of the most important stops was made here.
 This city is very different from other cities in the country, as it is dominated by Arabic rather than African.
 Kruger National Park is located in the northeast of South Africa, along the border with Mozambique in the east, with Zimbabwe in the north, and the Crocodile River forms its southern boundary.
 The park area is 19,500 km²; it is divided into 14 different ecozones, each of which is a habitat for different wildlife.
 It is one of the main attractions of South Africa and is considered to be the leading South African National Park (SANParks).
 As in all South African national parks, there is a daily conservation fee for its protection and visitation.
 It may also be advantageous to buy a Wild Card, which allows you to visit South African national parks either selectively or all.
 The territory of Hong Kong was named after the island of Hong Kong, a place that many tourists consider the main object of their attention.
 The string of buildings that make up the Hong Kong skyline is compared to a glittering bar chart, framed by the waters of Victoria Harbour.
 To see the most picturesque places of Hong Kong, you should leave the island and go to the coast of the peninsula of Chu Lung, which is located opposite.
 The majority of the urban development of Hong Kong Island is concentrated on reclaimed land on the north shore.
 This is the place that British colonizers took for themselves, and if you are looking for evidence of the colonial past of the territory, this is a good place to start.
 Sundarbans is the largest belt of coastal mangroves, stretching 80 km (50 miles) from the shore into the continent in Bangladesh and India.
 Sundarbans has been declared a UNESCO World Heritage Site. Part of the forest within Indian territory is called the Sundarbans National Park.
 These forests are not just mangrove swamps — they also include some of the last remaining great jungles that once covered the Gangetic Plains.
 Sundarbans covers an area of 3850 square km, of which about a third is covered by water or swamps.
 Since 1966, Sundarbans has been a wildlife sanctuary, and it is estimated that there are now 400 Bengal tigers and about 30,000 spotted deer on the islands.
 Buses leave from the intercity bus station (across the river) throughout the day, though most of the ones going to the east and to Jakarta/Bandung leave between 06:30 and 07:30.
 Since intercity buses are often crowded, it is advisable to buy a ticket a few days in advance.
 Most areas are served by small Japanese buses Coaster, comfortable and reliable.
 The minibus is a quick and convenient way to get to places like Paro (150 ngultrum) and Punakha (200 ngultrum).
 The Oyapock Bridge is a cable-stayed bridge that spans the Oyapock River and connects the cities of Oyapock in Brazil and Saint-Georges-de-l'Oyapock in French Guiana.
 These two towers reach 83 meters in height, and the bridge itself is 378 meters long and has two lanes 3.5 meters wide.
 The height of the substructure is 15 meters. Construction was completed in August 2011, it was not opened for traffic until March 2017.
 According to the plan, the bridge will be fully operational in September 2017, when Brazilian customs checkpoints are expected to be completed.
 The Guaraní were the most significant indigenous group inhabiting the region that is now eastern Paraguay, they lived as semi-nomadic hunter-gatherers who also practiced subsistence agriculture.
 The Chaco region was home to different groups of local tribes, for example the Guaycuru and the Payaaguas, who survived by hunting, gathering and fishing.
 In the 16th century, Paraguay, which was then called the "great province of the East Indies", emerged as a result of the clash between Spanish conquerors and local indigenous groups.
 The Spanish began a period of colonization that lasted three centuries.
 Since the founding of Asunción in 1537, Paraguay has largely managed to preserve much of its distinctive character and identity.
 Argentina is known for having one of the best teams, and also the best players in the world in a sport like polo.
 The biggest tournament of the year is held in December at the polo fields in Las Canitas.
 Less major tournaments and matches can also be seen at other times of the year.
 To find out about the polo matches and where to buy tickets, visit the website of the Argentine Polo Association.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland Islands pound (FKP), the value of which is equivalent to the value of one British pound sterling (GBP).
 Money can be exchanged at the only bank on these islands, which is located in Port Stanley opposite the FIC West shop.
 British pounds will be accepted everywhere on the islands, and in Stanley, credit cards and US dollars are also often accepted.
 In remote islands, credit cards may not be accepted, though British and American currency may be accepted; clarify with the owners in advance what method of payment is acceptable.
 The currency of the Falkland Islands is almost impossible to exchange outside of the islands, so exchange your money before you leave.
 Since Montevideo is located south of the equator, there is summer when it is winter in the Northern Hemisphere, and vice versa.
 Montevideo is located in the subtropics. In the summer months, air temperatures above +30 ° C are common.
 Winter can be deceptively cold: temperatures rarely drop below freezing, but the combination of wind and humidity creates the feeling of colder weather than the thermometer indicates.
 There are no particularly "rainy" and "dry" seasons: the amount of precipitation is approximately the same throughout the year.
 Although many animals in the park are used to seeing people, nature is still wild, so do not feed or disturb the animals.
 The park administration warns: do not approach bears and wolves within 100 yards/meters, and all other wildlife within 25 yards/meters!
 No matter how docile they look, bison, moose, bears and pretty much all large animals can attack.
 Every year, dozens of visitors are injured because they do not respect the necessary distance. These animals are large, wild and potentially dangerous, so respect their personal space.
 Also, remember that smells attract bears and other wild animals, so avoid cooking or carrying smelly food with you, and keep your camp clean.
 Apia is the capital of Samoa. The city is located on the island of Upolu and has a population of just under 40,000 inhabitants.
 Apia was founded in the 1850s and has been the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 The bay was the site of a notorious naval standoff in 1889, when seven ships from Germany, the United States, and Britain refused to leave the bay.
 All ships sank, except for one British cruiser. About 200 American and German sailors died.
 During the Mau Mau struggle for independence, a peaceful meeting in the town led to the assassination of the paramount chief Tupaia Tamasese Leaoif III.
 There are many beaches here, as Auckland is located on the shores of two harbors. The most popular beaches are in three areas.
 The beaches of North Shore (in the area of North Harbour) are washed by the Pacific Ocean and stretch from Long Bay in the north to Devonport in the south.
 Almost all of these beaches are sandy with safe swimming, and many of them are shaded by trees such as the pohutukawa.
 In the central area of Auckland, where the Waitemata Harbour is home to the prestigious suburbs of Mishn Bay and St Heliers, Tamaki Drive beaches stretch out.
 These are sometimes crowded family beaches with a good selection of shops along the shore, and swimming is safe.
 The most popular local beer is "Number One", it has a simple, pleasant and refreshing taste. Another local beer is called "Manta".
 There are many French wines that can be drunk, but New Zealand and Australian wines can be transported better.
 Local tap water is perfectly safe to drink, but if you are still concerned, it is easy to find bottled water.
 Australians do not understand the idea of "flat white". "Small black" is an espresso, cappuccino they serve with a high layer of whipped cream (not with foam), and tea without milk.
 Hot chocolate meets Belgian standards. Although fruit juices are expensive, they are of excellent quality.
 The reef is visited year round, and injuries caused by any of these reasons on the reef are rare.
 Still, follow the recommendations of the authorities, obey all signs and pay close attention to safety warnings.
 Cubomedusa is found near beaches and river mouths north of 1770 from October to April, and sometimes outside of this period.
 Sharks do exist, but they rarely attack humans. Most sharks are afraid of humans and swim away.
 Saltwater crocodiles do not lead an active life in the ocean, and their main habitat is the estuaries of rivers north of Rockhampton.
 Advance booking allows the traveler not to worry about where to stay upon arrival at the destination.
 Travel agents often make deals with specific hotels, but you can book through a travel agent and other forms of accommodation, such as camping sites.
 Travel agents usually sell package deals that include breakfast, airport transfers or even combined packages that include flights and hotel accommodation.
 In addition, they can hold the reservation if you need time to think about the offer or to get other documents for the destination (for example, visa).
 Any changes or requests must be sent to the travel agency first, not directly to the hotel.
 At some music festivals, the vast majority of attendees sleep on the festival grounds, and most of them consider it a mandatory part of the program.
 If you want to be near the stage, you need to arrive early to find a camping spot near the music.
 Remember that even if the music on the main stages has finished, there may be areas on the festival where the music will continue until late at night.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with young children.
 If you are crossing the northern Baltic Sea in winter, find out about the location of the cabin, as the passage through the ice leads to a rather scary noise, which can disturb the sleep of the most sensitive people.
 St. Petersburg cruises include city tours. Cruise passengers are exempt from visa requirements (check conditions).
 Casinos usually make every effort to make visitors spend as much time as possible and spend as much money as possible in the institution. There are no windows and clocks there, and exits can be difficult to find.
 They usually offer special food, drinks and entertainment to keep guests happy and not leave the establishment.
 Some establishments offer free alcohol. However, intoxication clouds the mind, and all good players know how important it is to stay sober.
 Anyone planning to travel in high-altitude areas or mountain passes should be aware of the possibility of snow, ice or frost.
 On an icy and snowy road, friction is low, and you will not be able to drive the car the same way as on an ordinary asphalt road.
 During a blizzard, enough snow to get stuck can fall in a very short period of time.
 Visibility may also be limited due to snow, sleet, fog, or ice on the windshield.
 On the other hand, weather conditions with snow and ice are normal in many countries, and road traffic continues throughout the year almost without interruption.
 A safari is probably the biggest draw for tourists in Africa and the main event for many travelers.
 The term safari in everyday use means a land trip to see the amazing wildlife of Africa, especially in the savannah.
 Some animals, such as elephants or giraffes, often approach cars, so you can get a good view with ordinary equipment.
 Lions, cheetahs and leopards are sometimes shy and you will see them better through binoculars.
 Walking safari (also called "bushwalking safari", "hiking safari" or "walking safari") consists of a walk lasting from a few hours to several days.
 The Paralympic Games will take place from 24 August to 5 September 2021, with some events taking place in different locations across Japan.
 Tokyo will be the only Asian city to have hosted the Summer Olympics twice, having first done so in 1964.
 If you booked flights and accommodation for 2020 before the date was announced, you may have a difficult situation.
 Cancellation policies may vary, but as of the end of March, most of the rules related to the coronavirus do not apply to July 2020, when the Olympic Games were scheduled to take place.
 It is expected that most tickets for the events will cost between 2,500 and 130,000 yen, with a standard ticket price of around 7,000 yen.
 Ironing wet clothes helps them dry. Many hotels provide an iron and ironing board for rent, even if they are not in the room.
 If you don't have an iron handy or you're not a fan of wearing ironed socks, you can try a hair dryer if you have one.
 Do not expose the fabric to too high temperatures (which can cause shrinkage or, in very rare cases, burns).
 There are different ways to purify water, some of them more effective against specific threats.
 In some places, it is enough to boil water for a minute, in others it will take a few minutes.
 Filters are effective in different ways, and in case of doubt you should consider buying water in sealed bottles and from a reputable company.
 Travelers may encounter pests that they have not seen in their home countries.
 Pests can spoil food, cause irritation or, worse, cause allergic reactions, release toxins or transmit infection.
 Infectious diseases themselves or dangerous animals that can cause damage or death to humans are not generally considered pests.
 Shopping "duty-free" is an opportunity to buy goods in certain points without taxes and excise duties.
 Travelers heading to high-tax countries can sometimes save a significant amount, especially on items like alcohol and tobacco.
 The stretch between Point Marion and Fermont has the most difficult driving conditions on the Buffalo-Pittsburgh Expressway, often passing through isolated, hilly, and wooded terrain.
 If you are not used to driving on country roads, be on your guard: there are steep slopes, narrow alleys and sharp turns.
 The speed limits are noticeably lower than on the previous and subsequent sections - usually 35-40 mph (56-64 km / h) - and strict compliance with them is even more important than the rest.
 However, strangely enough, mobile phone coverage here is much better than in many other parts of the route, for example in Pennsylvania Wilds.
 German pastry is quite good. In Bavaria it is very abundant and varied and resembles the pastry of their southern neighbour, Austria.
 Fruit cakes are common, apple pies are year-round, and cherries and plums appear in the summer.
 In German baking often used almonds, hazelnuts and other nuts. Often popular cakes are perfectly combined with a cup of strong coffee.
 If you want small, but filling, baked goods, try something that, depending on the region, is called oladji or pancakes with filling.
 Curry is a dish made of herbs and spices combined with meat or vegetables.
 Depending on the liquid content, curry can be "dry" or "wet".
 In the interior of Pakistan and northern India, yogurt is used in curry. In southern India and certain regions on the subcontinent's coast, coconut milk is commonly used.
 Indonesian cuisine, with 17,000 islands to choose from, is a general term used to refer to the vast variety of regional cuisines found across the country.
 But without qualification, the term is most often understood to refer to food from the central and eastern parts of the main island of Java.
 The cuisine of Java, now widespread throughout the archipelago, includes a variety of simple dishes flavored with peanuts, chili, sugar (especially Javanese coconut sugar) and various spices.
 Strings are supports for the rider's legs hanging from both sides of the saddle.
 They provide the rider with better stability, but there may be safety issues, as there is a risk of getting a foot stuck.
 If the horse has thrown the rider but his leg is caught in the stirrup, the running horse may drag him along. To minimize this risk, a number of precautions can be taken.
 First, most riders wear riding boots with a heel, which have a smooth and fairly thin sole.
 In addition, individual saddles, especially English ones, are equipped with safety springs, thanks to which the leather strap falls off the saddle if the rider falls back.
 The Coquimbo Valley is the main destination in Chile for mountaineering, and is known as the Yosemite of South America, with a large number of big granite walls and cliffs.
 At the top you can enjoy stunning mountain scenery, and rock climbers from around the world are constantly creating new routes in its vast potential for alpinism.
 Winter mountain sports, including skiing and snowboarding, are popular sports that involve descending a snow-covered terrain on skis or a snowboard attached to the feet.
 Skiing is the main tourist destination for many ski enthusiasts (sometimes called "ski bums") who plan their entire vacation around skiing in a particular location.
 The idea of skiing is very old: rock paintings depicting skiers date back to 5000 BC!
 Skiing as a sport goes back at least to the 17th century, and in 1861, Norwegians opened the first recreational ski club in Australia.
 Ski touring is also called backcountry, skitouring or hiking on skis.
 This is associated, but usually does not include walking up to the summit and then descending on unprepared slopes, as riding on the plain requires more rigid skis and boots.
 Imagine that the ski route is a hiking route.
 Under good conditions, you can cover several times more distance than when walking, but you can only develop such speed on skis in very rare cases when you do not have a heavy backpack and there is a marked trail.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but it has many independent countries, and in ordinary circumstances, traveling through many of them would mean having to apply for visas and go through passport control many times.
 But the Schengen Area in this respect functions as a single country.
 While in this zone, you can usually cross the border without having to go through passport control again.
 Similarly, if you have a Schengen visa, you do not need to apply for a visa in each of the Schengen countries separately, which will save you time and money, and avoid the paperwork.
 There is no universal definition of what constitutes antiques. Some tax authorities define goods that are 100 years old as antiques.
 This concept has geographical variants in which the age limit in places such as North America may be lower than in Europe.
 Handicrafts can be defined as antiques, despite the fact that they are younger than similar mass-produced goods.
 Reindeer herding is an important source of livelihood for the Sami people, and the culture surrounding this activity is also important for many other professions.
 Although this is the tradition, not all representatives of the Saami people engaged in mass breeding of reindeer; they lived fishing, hunting and other similar fisheries, using reindeer mainly as pack animals.
 Today, many Saami are employed in modern professions. Tourism is an important source of income in the Saami region of Lapland.
 Although the word "Gypsy" is widely used, especially among non-Roma, it is often considered offensive because of associations with negative stereotypes and misconceptions about the Roma people.
 If the country you are planning to visit has travel advisories in place, this may affect your travel insurance while you are there or your cancellation insurance.
 You may also wish to consult other governments, in addition to your own, but their advice is aimed at their own citizens.
 Here's one example: U.S. citizens in the Middle East may face situations that Europeans or Arabs cannot.
 The information reports only briefly describe the political situation in one country.
 The opinions expressed are often superficial, vague and overly simplified in comparison with the more detailed information that is widely available.
 Adverse weather conditions are a general term for any dangerous weather phenomenon that can cause damage, serious social disruption, or loss of life.
 Adverse weather conditions are everywhere around the world, and they are of various types, which depend on geography, terrain and atmospheric conditions.
 Strong winds, hail, heavy rains and forest fires are manifestations and effects of severe weather events such as tornadoes, waterspouts, dust devils and hurricanes.
 Regional and seasonal hazards include blizzards, snowstorms, ice and dust storms.
 Travellers are advised to take into account any risks associated with severe weather in their area, as they may affect any travel plans.
 Anyone planning to visit a country that may be considered a war zone should receive professional training.
 A search on the Internet for the phrase "security course in hostile environment" may produce the address of a local company.
 The course usually covers much more in detail all the topics discussed here, often with practical training.
 The course usually lasts from 2 to 5 days and includes playing out scenarios, a lot of first aid information, and sometimes weapons training.
 Books and magazines about survival in wild conditions are common, but there are not many publications about war zones.
 People planning to have sex-change surgery abroad should make sure they have valid travel documents for the return journey.
 The willingness of governments to issue passports without gender designation (X) or documents updated to reflect preferred name and gender varies.
 The willingness of foreign governments to fulfill their obligations under these instruments is equally varied.
 Security checks at checkpoints also became much more thorough after the events of September 11, 2001.
 Transgender people preparing for surgery should not expect to be able to pass through scanners and have their privacy and dignity respected.
 Backwash — the current created by waves that break on the shore, or sometimes on a reef or something similar.
 The return flow is concentrated in a few deeper areas where rapid currents may form, descending to greater depths, due to this submarine topography.
 Most deaths occur as a result of exhaustion when trying to swim back against the current, which can be impossible.
 Once you get out of the current, swimming back will not be any more difficult than usual.
 Try to go somewhere where you won't be caught again, or, depending on your skills and whether you were seen, you may want to wait for rescue.
 Culture shock occurs before the return to the home country, is longer and can be more severe.
 Travelers who are easily adaptable to new cultures sometimes find it particularly difficult to re-adapt to their own culture.
 When you return home after living abroad, you are adapted to the new culture and have lost some of your native culture.
 When you first went abroad, people were likely to treat you with patience and understanding, knowing that travelers need to adjust to a new country.
 It may be surprising to people that patience and understanding are also needed for travelers returning home.
 The sound and light show on the pyramid is one of the most interesting events in the area for children.
 The pyramids can be seen in the dark, and you can also see them in silence before the show starts.
 Usually there is always a noise from tourists and vendors. The history of sound and light is like a book with stories.
 The Sphinx acts as a backdrop and narrator of a long story.
 The scenes show on the pyramids, and different pyramids are illuminated.
 Several countries claim the South Shetland Islands, which were discovered in 1819, and there are more bases on the islands than anywhere else in the world, with sixteen active in 2020.
 The archipelago is located 120 kilometers from the peninsula. The largest island is named after King George with the settlement of Villa Las Estrellas.
 Others include Livingston Island and Deception, where the submerged caldera of an active volcano is a spectacular natural harbor.
 The Elsworth Land is an area south of the Antarctic Peninsula, washed by the Bellingshausen Sea.
 The mountains of this peninsula here merge with the plateau, and then rise again and form a 360-kilometer mountain system Elsuert, divided by the Minnesota glacier into two parts.
 In the northern part, that is, on the ridge of the Sentinel, are the highest mountains of Antarctica - the Vinson massif, the highest point of which reaches 4892 m and is called Vinson peak.
 In remote areas outside of mobile phone coverage, a satellite phone may be your only option.
 A satellite phone is not a replacement for a mobile phone, as you need to be in an area with a direct line of sight to the satellite in order to make a call.
 The service is often used in shipping, including pleasure and high-speed vessels, where there is a need for remote data transmission and voice communication.
 You will usually be able to get more information about this service by contacting your local telephone company.
 An option becoming more popular for those planning to take a gap year is to travel and study.
 This is especially popular among high school graduates, allowing them to take a year off before entering university, without jeopardizing their education.
 In many cases, taking a course abroad during an academic vacation can indeed improve your chances of getting into higher education institutions at home.
 Usually, when applying to such educational programs, a fee is charged for tuition.
 Finland is an excellent place for boating. In the "land of a thousand lakes" there are also thousands of islands on the lakes and in the coastal archipelagos.
 Exploring archipelagos or visiting lakes, you can easily do without a yacht.
 While the coastal archipelagos and the largest lakes can indeed accommodate any yacht, smaller boats or even kayaks leave completely different impressions.
 Boating is a national pastime in Finland, with one boat for seven or eight people.
 A similar situation is found in Norway, Sweden and New Zealand, but in other cases it is quite unique (for example, in the Netherlands this value ranges from one to forty).
 Most Baltic cruises include an extended stay in Russian St. Petersburg.
 This means that you can spend several full days in this historic city and sleep on the ship.
 If you go ashore only on an organized tour, you do not need a separate visa (since 2009).
 Some cruise brochures show Berlin, Germany. As you can see on the map above, Berlin is far from the sea and a visit to the city is not included in the cruise price.
 Flying by plane can be scary for anyone of any age or social status, especially if it is their first flight in life or if they have had a traumatic experience in the past.
 There is no need to be ashamed of this: it is no different from personal dislike and fear of other things that many people have.
 Understanding how an airplane works and what happens during a flight can help to overcome the fear that arises from the unknown or the inability to control the process.
 Delivery services are well paid for fast delivery. Often the speed of delivery of commercial documents, goods or spare parts for urgent repair is very important.
 Some routes have their own planes for larger companies, but for other routes and smaller companies, this was a problem.
 If they were sending anything as air freight, it could take several days to unload and clear customs on some routes.
 The only way to deal with it faster is to send it as checked baggage. The airline regulations do not allow to send baggage without a passenger, so you need to be involved.
 The most obvious way to fly first or business class is to pay for the privilege (or, better, get your company to pay for you).
 However, this is not cheap - by experience in rough approximation you will pay  four times more than the usual economy class for business and eleven times more for first class!
 As a rule, it makes no sense to even look for discounts on business class or first class for direct flights from A to B.
 Airlines know that there is a certain core group of passengers who are willing to pay a premium to get somewhere quickly and comfortably, so they charge accordingly.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau. The local language is Romanian, but Russian is also widely spoken.
 Moldova is a multi-ethnic republic that has become a victim of ethnic conflict.
 In 1994, this conflict led to the creation of the self-proclaimed Transnistrian Republic in eastern Moldova, which has its own government and currency, but is not recognized by any UN member state.
 Despite the failure of political negotiations, economic ties between these two parts of Moldova were restored.
 The main religion in Moldova is Orthodox Christianity.
 Izmir is the third largest city in Turkey with a population of about 3.7 million, the largest port after Istanbul and an excellent transport hub.
 Once an ancient city of Ephesus today is a modern, developed and busy trade center, located along the huge bay and surrounded by mountains.
 Broad boulevards, glass-fronted buildings, modern shopping centres are interspersed with traditional red-tiled roofs, an 18th-century market, old mosques and churches, though the city has more of a Mediterranean European feel than traditional Turkey.
 From the village of Halhorsvik opens a view of the nearby island of Estuary, also it is located an unusual octagonal church.
 In the church cemetery over some graves there are interesting marble sculptures of pigeons.
 It is worth to devote half an hour and walk through the unusual village.
 Not far away, to the north, is the romantic and charming town of Sintra, celebrated by Lord Byron and known worldwide since then.
 Scotturb bus number 403 makes regular trips to Sintra and stops at Cabo da Roca.
 Further north, visit the great Temple of Our Lady of Fatima (the mausoleum) - the place of the world-famous apparitions of the Virgin Mary.
 Please remember that you are, in principle, standing on a place of a brotherly grave, and also a place that is inexpressibly important for a considerable percentage of the inhabitants of the globe.
 There are still many men and women alive who survived their stay here, but there are even more people whose loved ones were killed here or worked to death here, whether Jewish or of other nationalities.
 Please treat this place with all the dignity, seriousness and respect it deserves. Don't joke about the Holocaust and Nazis.
 Do not deface this place by scribbling or scratching graffiti on the objects around.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish, with about half the population preferring to speak Catalan, most people understand it, and almost everyone speaks Spanish.
 However, most signs are only in Catalan, as it is the first official language by law.
 However, Spanish is also widely used in public transport and other public places.
 The usual announcements in the metro are made only in Catalan, but unscheduled interruptions are announced by an automated system in a variety of languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese.
 Parisians are known to be self-centered, rude and arrogant.
 While it may just be a false stereotype, the best way to succeed in Paris is to behave in the best way possible as a "bien élevé" (well-bred) person, which will make it much easier to adapt to the city.
 The unfriendly appearance of Parisians will immediately disappear, if you show a little elementary politeness.
 Plitvice Lakes National Park is heavily forested, mostly with beech, fir and pine, and is a mixture of alpine and Mediterranean vegetation.
 Thanks to the combination of microclimates, different soils and altitude differences, it is particularly rich in plant communities.
 The area is home to a huge variety of different animals and birds.
 Here you can meet rare representatives of fauna, for example, the European brown bear, wolf, eagle, owl, lynx, wild cat and grouse, as well as many other common species of animals.
 When visiting monasteries, women should be dressed in skirts below the knee and with shoulders covered.
 Most monasteries give robes to women who come unprepared, but if you bring your own, especially if it is a bright color, the monk or nun at the entrance will smile at you.
 Similarly, men should wear pants that cover the knees.
 These can also be taken at the entrance, but these clothes are not washed after each use, so you may not be comfortable in these skirts. One size for all men!
 The cuisine of Majorca, like that of similar Mediterranean regions, is based on vegetables, bread and meat (especially pork), with olive oil used everywhere.
 A simple and popular lunch dish, especially in the summer, is Pa-amb-oli: bread with olive oil, tomatoes and any filling such as cheese, tuna, etc.
 All nouns, as well as the word Sie, meaning You, are always capitalized even in the middle of a sentence.
 It is important to distinguish between verbs and complements.
 This also makes reading easier, while writing is somewhat more complicated by the need to determine whether the verb or adjective is in the substantivized form.
 Pronunciation in Italian is relatively simple, as most words are pronounced exactly as they are spelled.
 One should be especially careful with the letters c and g, as their pronunciation changes depending on the following vowel.
 Also, remember that r and rr are pronounced differently: caro means "expensive", and carro means "carriage".
 Persian language has relatively easy and mostly regular grammar.
 Therefore, reading this Persian grammar book will help you learn a lot of new things and better understand the expressions.
 Obviously, if you speak a Romance language, it will be easier for you to learn Portuguese.
 However, people who know a little Spanish may hastily conclude that Portuguese is sufficiently similar and can be learned without separate study.
 Ancient observatories are usually considered obsolete today and serve as museums or educational institutions.
 Since light pollution was not such a problem during their heyday, they are usually located in cities or campuses, which are easier to reach than those built in our time.
 Most modern research telescopes are huge structures in remote locations with favorable atmospheric conditions.
 The contemplation of the cherry blossom, called "hanami", became part of Japanese culture in the 8th century.
 This idea came from China, where the favorite flower was the plum.
 In Japan, the first celebrations of the Sakura blossom were organized by the Emperor only for himself and other members of the aristocracy at the Imperial court.
 Plants look best in their natural environment, so don't be tempted to take even one specimen.
 Visiting an officially organized garden to collect "samples" will also result in you being thrown out without any discussion.
 Singapore is generally a very safe place to be, where it is easy to navigate and almost everything can be bought upon arrival.
 But, being in the "deep tropics" only a few degrees north of the equator, you will have to cope with both the heat (constantly) and the strong sun (when the sky is clear, less often).
 There are also a few buses going north to Hebron, the legendary burial place of the biblical patriarchs Abraham, Isaac and Jacob, and their wives.
 Make sure the bus you are getting on is going to Hebron, not just the nearby Jewish settlement Kiryat Arba.
 Inland waterways can be a good theme for any holiday.
 For example, visiting castles in the Loire Valley, the Rhine Valley, cruising on a riverboat to the Danube, or traveling by boat on the Erie Canal.
 They also define routes for popular walking and cycling routes.
 Christmas is one of the most important holidays in Christianity, and it is celebrated as the birthday of Jesus.
 Many traditions associated with this holiday have also been adopted by non-believers in Christian countries and non-Christians around the world.
 There is a tradition to spend the Easter night, not going to bed, in some open place to see the sunrise.
 Of course, this tradition has a Christian theological explanation, but it may well be a pre-Christian ritual of spring and fertility.
 More traditional churches often hold Easter services on Saturday evening during the Easter holiday, with the congregation usually starting the celebration of the Resurrection of Christ at midnight.
 All the animals that originally arrived on these islands got here by swimming, flying, or being washed ashore.
 Due to the great distance from the mainland, mammals were unable to reach the islands, making the giant tortoise the main herbivore on the Galapagos Islands.
 Since the arrival of humans to the Galapagos Islands, many mammals have been introduced, including goats, horses, cows, rats, cats, and dogs.
 If you visit the Arctic or Antarctic in winter, you will experience a polar night, when the sun does not rise above the horizon.
 This is a good opportunity to see the northern lights, because the sky will be more or less dark for 24 hours.
 Since these areas are sparsely populated, and as a result, light pollution is often not a problem, you will also be able to enjoy the stars.
 Japanese work culture is more hierarchical and formal than what Westerners are used to.
 Suits are standard business attire, and colleagues refer to each other by their last name or by their job title.
 Harmony in the workplace is extremely important, and the results of group work are valued above individual achievements.
 Employees are usually required to get permission from the boss before making any decisions and are required to obey the boss's orders without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.3639273234067749, 'precisions': [0.6688245448838669, 0.426376858963883, 0.29547391749062396, 0.20817744521646178], 'brevity_penalty': 1.0, 'length_ratio': 1.0310262529832936, 'translation_length': 25488, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 63.22949322060658, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2}